Mom's Ripple Effect
byJayPierce95©
Writer's Note: This is a long story. It is conveniently labeled with parts and chapters in case you choose to read it in more than one sitting. This story is a mom/son incest novella that expands greatly on one of the more cliche mom/son scenarios. If you love sexy details and seeing how things succeed or fail in coming together, then this is for you. If you like to-the-point sex stories, then it may not be to your liking. This story contains incest, blackmail, cheating, relationship drama, exhibitionism, hot outfits, filthy dialogue, and a lot of cum.

------Prologue------

"Go, Abigail, Go! You got this! C'mon, Abi!"

Screaming and cowbells tore through the brisk April air. Dew was on the hard grass and the breaths from hundreds of desperate hollers condensed into a mist. For over two hours now, thousands of people had been standing along the edge of a swiftly-moving river. Brightly-colored tents and signs stretched along the banks as far as the eye could see. Large canopies with tables inside loaded with food and portable coffee machines were the only refuge from the cold. People continually turned their tired-eyes to the darkening clouds and wondered when the sky would finally open up to unleash freezing rain.

For most people, it would seem to be an unbearable way to spend a Saturday morning. But for parents of high school rowers, such as Heather Gaines, this was so commonplace that they actually looked forward to it.

Every fifteen minutes a new set of racing shells would rigorously glide down the water- the rowers getting sprayed with the splashes of their own oars. Sometimes it would be boats of eight rowers, sometimes boats of four, sometimes boats of two, and there were also singles. It was an exciting sport to watch because the athletes were giving every ounce of energy they could muster with each stroke hoping that they would place well enough to move on in the tournament.

Many parents were lighthearted about the events and just wanted to happily cheer their children on. Some parents, like Heather Gaines, were as competitive during the events as the rowers.

Heather was not so much a yeller or chanter. She was the type to silently stand on the very edge of the bank and mutter comments to herself as she peered through her binoculars. She was not considered the 'crazy, competitive mom' on the team by any means, though. Heather's son, Paul, rowed for an elite private school, and many of the other parents were equally as competitive as Heather. Heather did like to think Paul got his competitiveness from her.

Unlike the other families, The Gaines family was not wealthy, but Paul got to attend the private school for free due to his dad, Richard, being one of the four coaches of the rowing team.

Having been going to team practices since he was in middle school so he could fill in on boats for older students who were injured or absent, Paul was now an elite high-school rower. More importantly, he was in his senior year and he had not yet committed to a college scholarship. He had plenty of offers, but his heart was set on Princeton.

This made this an important weekend.



For the last three years, Paul had been part of the varsity-eight boat, which was the most prestigious boat in high school rowing. While five other rowers in his boat had already gotten scholarships to Ivy-League colleges, Paul had not. This not only bothered Heather because her son was not going to get the best education possible, but she had to endure the passive-aggressive and condescending statements from other moms on the team:

"That's okay, I'm sure someone will offer him one as they get more desperate to fill their rosters."

"Yeah, scholarship agreements collapse all the time. I'm sure if things fall through with other rowers, they'll eventually give Paul a look. He'll be fine!"

"My friend told me Cornell might still be looking. But, hey, if they don't, it's not like rowing for a state school is that bad."

It was a frustrating nightmare for someone as competitive as Heather. It was hard for her to bite her lip and not lash out. If she did, the other parents would probably call her jealous. And being part of the 'poor' family, Heather did not want her status to fall even lower.

In fact, Heather believed that the only reason parents treated her as one of them was that they thought they could influence her husband through her, along with the special treatment that tends to come with being remarkably attractive.

Positions on the boats were a big deal. Rowers on the ends of the boats were more likely to be sought by college scouts. Parents would always make comments 'to themselves' in earshot of Heather:

"We just can't seem to compete like we used to. I wonder if Charles moved to the front of the boat we would go faster?"

Heather usually rolled her eyes at their lame attempts to jockey for their sons. Besides, Heather clearly was not that influential with her husband. For three years, Paul had been in the middle of the varsity boat. Heather constantly asked her husband to move him to the bow or stern. He always gave the same spiel about it being based on times from rowing machine competitions and weight distribution:

"Honey, you have to at least try putting Paul in the bow. We aren't one of those WASP families that can buy his way into Princeton. They can do that. In fact, I know they've done that. They brag about their fucking donation size all the time. You'd think they'd be embarrassed by people knowing they bought their kid in, but they like bragging about their money even more."

"Babe, you know very well that I do whatever makes the boat go the fastest. I can't show favoritism. You know my methods for boat positions."

Those conversations happened again and again for nearly three years. And they always ended with Richard saying he could not be seen as biased and that it was based on weight and rowing times. During those years, those conversations became less frequent as Heather became more skeptical. There were times where Paul and other rowers had fluctuated weights and rowing times, and yet, no change.

It was aggravating to see mothers like Mary and Gretchen gloat about their sons' placements and how they "lead the boat," while Heather watched her son perform just as well, and sometimes better.

It had gotten to the point where Heather went to the credit union to see if her husband had been taking payments from the parents. Heather probably would not have even been mad. If Richard had been taking money to help pay for Paul's books and living costs while at school, Heather might have understood. But there were no such payments.

It was last August, however, when Heather and Richard were driving home from Target and Heather saw a text notification on her husband's phone, which was propped up on the dashboard to be used as a GPS. It was a message from Gretchen saying, "It's almost time to open the official rowing season again! I hope you're excited... I know I am ;)"

To this day, Heather had never mentioned that she saw that message. She was never sure if it had the implication her gut reaction told her it had. It was not weird for her husband to be messaging a parent, but it was weird how quickly he swiped the notification away once he saw it.

Heather was not sure why, but she was comfortable pretending nothing happened. Maybe it was because she knew she was on another level physically than Gretchen so she posed no threat, or maybe because she finally had an explanation for her son's lack of a scholarship that also helped her to vilify the other mothers she hated.

Either way, whatever conversation Heather wanted to have with her husband could wait until Paul was safely at Princeton- far away from any possible ramifications marital problems could have on his rowing career.

This brings us to this important weekend.

------Part One------

 Ch. 1

This weekend did not come without a major twist, though. It was the first weekend where Paul would not be on the varsity-eight boat. He was rowing in a single. After being advised by his mom that he would never have a good position on the varsity boat and that he should switch to a single, Paul begged his dad until he gave in.

The other mothers were making even more patronizing comments than usual about how it's okay that Paul "did not make the boat his senior year", but Heather kept her mouth shut- just as she had always done. She believed in her son and had faith that he could impress the college scouts in a single.

When it came time for Paul's first row, Heather focused on the floating starting platform up the river through her binoculars. Her son was there alone, positioning his shell for his time trial. The result of this would affect his seeding and how good of a lane he would get for his first heat.

In his racing shell, Paul was nervous. He shook his arms to keep warm in his skin-tight, polyester unisuit, which was basically thick, stretchy boxers connected to a stretchy tank top. There was a joke that it was designed to make athletes so cold that they would race faster just to be able to put a coat on faster.

Heather could see the back of his brown hair and watched him lean forward and dig his oars into the water. Butterflies were in Heather's stomach, just as there were every time her son raced. Her toes tapped and she waited to see him launch.

And launch he did. Heather's auburn-red hair floated in mid-air as she jumped in excitement. She was more animated as usual because Paul was cutting through the water like a hot knife through melted butter. It looked like his best race yet.

It was not long before Paul passed Heather on the bank, close to the finish line. It seemed that he was running out of steam, but he was still in great position. Heather watched his powerful body crank the oars and exhale loudly with each stroke.

Heather normally looked up at the electronic clock to check his times, but she was feeling almost cocky about his performance and felt she did not need to. She grinned in the direction of her son and then turned to the other mothers to see their reactions. They gave a mixture of nonchalance and patronizing grins. But Heather could see they were stewing.

Paul had to row back to the exit dock and put his shell away. It was about half-an-hour later that Paul walked over to his team's canopy and headquarters.

"Third!" He exclaimed upon seeing his mom. "I should have the best lane in my heat!"

Heather proudly cheered and warmly embraced her son. It was moments like these where Heather realized how proud she was of Paul. He was now 5 inches taller than her 5'6" stature, and he had the maturity of someone that spent a lot of time with older people when growing up. "I'm so proud of you. You were amazing out there."

"Thanks! Dad said I might have went too hard at the start, but it went well overall," Paul said, still hugging his mom.

Heather could see the goosebumps on her son's arms and rubbed her jacket sleeves over them. "You need to get a jacket on, mister."

Paul nodded but did not let go yet. Heather suddenly remembered she should have ended the hug earlier, so she abruptly ended it. It may have seemed odd to those watching, so Heather quipped, "Alright, I'm not holding you up anymore. Go get a jacket and some food. You need it!"

Her son agreed and went over to the food tables.

As happy as Heather had been, she had suddenly been sent into a dark place. These dark moments happened only once every couple of months. In her moment of pride and enthusiasm from the race, she had made a mistake with Paul. She had triggered herself, and she knew what was coming. She knew she would have to suffer through a long moment of feeling as if she was going to recreate a problem that had long passed. It never got any easier to deal with.

 Ch. 2

Every time one of these moments of panic struck Heather, the events flashed through her mind like a film reel. Her mind went to Paul's 18th-birthday party. It was a surprise party. Though it was not a surprise for Paul, rather one for Heather.

Rich and Heather had to go away for the weekend to visit Rich's cousin in the hospital after she had gotten seriously ill. And plus, they figured they could turn the nights into a romantic getaway in a hotel.

But despite ordering Paul again and again not to throw a party in the empty house, they simply knew he was going to throw one. Fearing the neighbors to call the police, Rich and Heather decided it would be clever for Heather to drive back on Saturday evening and make sure Paul could not invite a bunch of people over to drink tons of beer.

When Heather got back to the house, however, there was no sign of any party. In fact, there was no sign of Paul. Heather did not text him. She figured that if he never knew she came home, then he would never know that his parents did not trust him.

Heather remembered how she waited around the house for two hours all alone before being certain he was not throwing a party at the house. She changed out of her blouse and jeans and put on more comfortable clothes. Having had expected a romantic evening with Rich, Heather found herself craving sexual satisfaction. "I need to fucking cum," she said aloud to herself, grinning.

Alone in her house, Heather hurried up to her bedroom and took her pink vibrator out of her nightstand. She quickly yanked her shapely yoga pants down her thighs and began touching the vibrating toy to her vaginal lips. She moaned instantly.

Heather allowed herself to see how much of a dirty and insatiable mood she could get herself into. It was not long before the vibrator was glistening. She dashed to her nightstand again and reached for her other sex toy- the one her husband did not know about. She grasped the long, beige dildo in her hand and bit her lip.

Then, as she had done a couple of times before, Heather sprinted to the spare bedroom with her vibrator and her suction-cup dildo. She stuck the dildo on the one plastic chair in the house that worked perfectly for her activity. With a thunderous moan, Heather's flooding pussy opened up and lubricated its way down the erect shaft. She began riding up and down on the dildo while she used her vibrator to stimulate her clit and outer lips.

It was such an incredible pleasure that her face was hot, her vision was hazy, and she zoned out to the sound of the intense vibrations. At that point, Heather was just seeing how much she could build herself up before climaxing.

The next memory was one that made Heather shutter every single time. Without warning, the door, which she did not close all the way, swung open. And there stood Paul, a canned beer in each hand, looking around as if he was trying to see who was drilling or sawing in the guest room.

Heather could never forget the look on his face, and she was sure he would never forget the look on hers. Her son was frozen. His jaw literally dropped down. His eyes were saucers. There is nothing you can say when you walk into a room to see your mom naked from the waist down and sliding down the shaft of a sex toy.

To Heather's horror, she watched as her son's erection grew in his shorts. Looking back on it, she could not blame him. Heather knew she was hot. She had always been told so. Her red hair, tanned ceramic skin, fit body, melon breasts, and thick thighs and ass were subject to a lot of attention over the years, even as she hit 40. And there she was, in nothing but a thin white v-neck, her red hair sticking to her sweaty skin, and two sex toys stimulating her glistening mound. It was a natural reaction for a drunk teenager.

In total, it was over 30 seconds before Heather finally wrapped her head around the situation enough to yell, "Go! Get out!"

Heather did know how she did not hear either of the two SUVs full of rowdy high-schoolers pull into the driveway. All she could think of was how she was never going to mention it to anyone again, and how she was not going to leave the guest room until the morning.

In the morning, Heather had hoped it would be the end of it. She hoped that her son, too, would just pretend that it did not happen. She could tell he was trying, but his hangover probably made his ogling glances more noticeable than he was imagining.

His attention was uncomfortable and stressful. Heather remembered making an urgent call to her friend where she suggested they set their kids up together for a date so they could "get them out of the house more." The friend thought it was a fun idea, and only after a week of Heather being stared at longingly by her son, she found relief in her son starting a new relationship.

The relationship did not last long, but during that time, and since then, Paul had not looked at her sexually.

 Ch. 3

Heather snapped back to the present. She reassured herself that as long as she did nothing stupid like letting her son see her half-naked again with her chest heaving out of her top again, she would be fine. Heather was a pro at letting bad things go. She had been convinced through experience that trying to combat a potentially-explosive situation just made things worse. And this situation with her son was an example of how a problem was able to be solved without having to risk digging into it. The panic had passed, and she was able to continue her day.

 Ch. 4

The day went on. And after the rain showers, the sun appeared and it felt like Spring. Heather and the other parents watched the rowers. Richard was down near the dock and boats so he could coach the rowers before their races.

Paul's first heat was in two hours, and he had left to go up the river bank so he could stretch out. Whenever Paul left to go to the boat area, Heather was always nervous. It meant the clock was winding down to race time, and the anticipation was anxiety-inducing. Today was especially bad because this weekend determined who would go to Nationals and get the chance to really impress collegiate coaches.

Each minute passed slowly. Heather occupied herself by bouncing on her toes for warmth and watching the current races.

One of the other mothers saw she was anxious and said, "You don't have to be so nervous, Heather. I'm sure your boy will do fine. He's not in the heat with the best rowers, so if he gives it his all then he'll probably make it out of this round."

"Thank you," Heather forced a smile, her teeth clenched.

About 45 minutes before the race, and only 25 minutes before Paul had to have his shell in the water so he could row to the starting platform, Heather felt her phone buzz in her pocket. Even if it was just a spam marketing message, she welcomed the distraction.

Unfortunately, it was not spam. It was a text from her husband. "Have you seen Paul? He should be here warming up already."

Confusion swept over Heather because Paul announced earlier he was going to warm up, and he left. Heather's mother's intuition kicked in and she began fearing something had happened to her son. Heather called him three times in a row with no answer.

Rowers filtered in and out of the canopy all day long, so Heather frantically asked each one if they had seen Paul. Finally, Mary's son, Dylan, approached the tent. When Heather asked him where Paul was, Dylan shrugged, "He says he's not rowing."

"What?!" Heather was confused and angry.

"Yeah, he said he just can't go out there."

Before Heather could ask more questions, Mary piped up to say, with fake sincerity, "Aww, that's a shame. I'm sorry, Heather. You know, some people just can't handle the pressure. Though, I guess it's better you find out now than at Nationals in front of those coaches."

Heather whipped her head around with death in her eyes. Mary shrunk in her chair because even she knew she had gone too far. Her fists in a ball, Heather demanded of Dylan, "Tell me where he is."

"He was literally just sitting alone in the woods on the other side of that trail. He told me to leave him alone. So... yeah."

With time ticking, Heather jogged up the river banks, past the dozens of trailers of boats, and across the main path. She thought she could see bits of her son's blue team uniform through the trees. She walked up a trail that went up a hill. Soon enough, she could see her son sitting on the end of a large boulder, his knees to his chest and head in his hands.

"Paul?" Heather said, softly.

Her son looked up, his eyes went wide, and he jolted. "Uh, hi." His face was beating and red.

"What's going on?" Heather spoke softly. "You need to be in the water really soon."

"I'm not rowing," he swallowed.

"Why not?"

"Because!" he shot back, quickly. He was clearly distressed.

"Ok, alright," Heather calmed. "I'm not here to force you to do anything you don't want to do. I'm your mother, and I just want to know why you're upset."

"I'm not upset!"

"Ok, ok. Well, why are you nervous to row? You've been in bigger races than this. You have no reason to be scared."

"I'm not scared," he moaned, "I want to race. I just... can't."

Heather was more confused. "Then tell me what's wrong."

Paul stayed silent and put his head back between his knees.

"You know, I won't force you to do anything." Heather may have said that to her son, but she then promptly checked her phone to see how much time she still had to help her son overcome his emotional problems and convince him to race.

"I just. I want to be alone right now."

"I know that's what you want, but I also know what's good for you. You sitting here sulking isn't good for you. You don't have to race, but at least get up."

A horrified expression appeared on Paul's face. "No," he said firmly. He then tightened his positioning.

"Are you hurt? If you pulled a muscle I'm sure the team doctor can h-"

"I didn't pull a muscle. I just want to be alone."

Heather could feel the precious moments ticking away on her son's chance at his dream college and her ability to see the look on the other moms' faces as her son did what she knew he was born to do. "You know, Paul, this isn't just about you. Your dad and I have worked tirelessly for the last few years to help you get to this position. Your dad spent years and years coaching you. I've used up all of my Saturdays and Sundays to watch you race. And we worked hard to make sure you have a chance to a great education, and you're throwing it away. How is that supposed to make us feel?"

Every word of that, Heather meant. But when Paul looked back up, his eyes were watering. "I'm sorry. I want to race too. I know what you guys have done. I want to be out there, but-"

"But what?"

Paul was silent.

"But what, Paul? You need to tell me, right now," Heather said sternly. "I'll only be disappointed if you don't tell me."

The son was flustered, but finally sighed, "I'm having a problem, down there."

"Oh," Heather was a bit taken aback. That was close to the last thing she thought he would say. She nearly laughed. "Well, people have problems with areas like that all the time. Sometimes the problem can be embarrassing, but it's not worth giving up on your future over. What type of problem is it?"

Paul swallowed and glanced away. "It, uh, won't-" He then motioned his hand down.

"Ohhhh," Heather pursed her lips. "That's not a big deal." She thought for a moment. "And you tried..."

"Obviously," Paul rolled his eyes in frustration.

"Has this happened before? What did you do last time?" Heather was not sure if she was sounding as awkwardly as she was feeling. She grinned and bore it.

"Not in a long time. And I don't have anything to help me now."

"Ah. I see. Well, you have a phone and Internet...I don't think anyone could see you here."

"I already tried that," Paul squirmed. "Nothing."

"God," Heather was surprised. "How long has it been, uh, up?"

Paul sighed. "I don't know. It has to be close to two hours now."

"Jesus!" Heather reacted. "Yeah, that's not normal at all. Is it painful?"

His forehead in the palm of his hand, Paul nodded.

"I can see why you can't race right now. Um- well, uh... Shit," Heather ran her hand over her face. She could tell that it was becoming less likely that her son would be able to race. "You can't tuck it to the side?"

"No, it hurts too much," Paul grunted. "And besides, I can't hide it in this stupid uniform."

"That's true." Heather was becoming seriously concerned about her son's health. Two hours is a long time, and there might be something severely wrong with him. "Have you considered you might be cut off? Sometimes the wiring in there can get messed up or twisted. It could be a big problem."

"I don't know if that's the case."

"Well, uh, has anything come out? I mean, after this amount of time, if nothing has come out I think you might have a serious issue."

Paul parted his knees and looked down. He shook his head. "I don't see anything."

It was clear that her son had a medical problem. Heather relented. "Ok, screw the race. I'm going to take you to the emergency room. I'm going to call your dad and have him beg to see if he can get you in a later heat due to a medical emergency."

Paul seemed unsure but nodded in agreement anyway. "Ok," he sighed.

Heather called her husband's number, but he did not pick up. "Fuck!" She yelled and then left an urgent message. She turned back to her son, who was still seated on the boulder. "Alright, Paul, I know you're embarrassed, but you gotta get up so we can go to the car. This isn't an embarrassing thing, this is a medical problem."

Still hesitant, Paul seemed to be having a debate in his head.

His mom was not so hesitant, as she was concerned about what could happen to him. "I get it, Paul, you don't want anyone seeing. Guess what? It's just a dick- half the people in the world have one and they all do the same thing and they all have problems with theirs at one point or another. So let's get going to the hospital before you lose it."

Paul reluctantly rose to his feet and turned around with his hands covering his groin. His hands covered his balls and most of his shaft, but his hands could not cover the tip, which rose high above his waist.

Heather saw the outline of the cockhead and her mind flashed back to how she had seen him on his birthday. Fortunately, in the emergency, she was able to shake it from her head.

She could see that he was right about his unisuit being dry. If an hour and a half of masturbation and porn could not generate even a little precum, then he was likely in trouble.

"I don't want to walk like this," Paul pleaded to his mom.

"Where's your jacket?"

"I took it off to go for a run. Then it happened."

"Shit. Here," Heather offered, "just wrap my hoodie around your waist." Heather had planned on wearing the heavy sweatshirt all day, but there was a greater need.

The mother quickly pulled her phone, clutch, and water bottle out of the big front pocket and set them down on the miniature plateau. She then finagled her hoodie off of her body. She flinched from the cold air hitting the lower part of her exposed stomach. She tugged her shirt down before pulling the rest of the beefy sweatshirt over her chest and head. In doing so, however, the bottom elastic band of the hoodie caught under her sizable breasts and lifted them up with her arms.

Once the hoodie was off, Heather could see that his pupils were wide. Paul's eyes were locked onto her chest. Heather had felt her boobs being lifted up, but she did not think anything of it. Immediately glancing down at her chest, Heather could see the last bit of movement from her cupped tits.

At that moment, a slight groan escaped Paul's mouth as his body subtly lurched in place. Heather was a good seven feet away, but she could visibly see a dark mark suddenly appear on her son's uniform. It expanded into a circle.

Paul looked down to see why his mom's face had turned to stone. He reached for the hoodie so he could quickly cover himself. But, in a snap decision, the mother pretended to see something far away in the tops of the trees and brought the hoodie back to her side. "Thought there was a weird-looking bird," she pretended to muse.

Heather had no idea if her son had bought her lame story, but she was not worried about that. What Heather was worried about was if she had accidentally reignited her son's unhealthy infatuation with her. She had been so good for so many months, and now, even with wearing light-gray thermal underwear with a bra underneath, she could have created a big problem.

It seemed insane to Heather that a shirt, which showed no cleavage, could have caused that reaction. She had not even planned on anyone seeing her in that shirt because she planned to have her hoodie on all day. The long-sleeved top may have hugged her body, but the idea that her boobs moving in it could elicit a reaction was met with disbelief and frustration.

It was probably the fact that he had finally stood up and removed his hands from his package that caused the erection. Heather had to be sure. Because if it was her body, she had a real issue.

Still standing on the boulder, several feet away from her son, Heather exclaimed, "Oof, it's cold," as she quickly bounced on her toes twice and held the hoodie out.

Paul did not reach for the warm sweatshirt right away because his body received another shock. A moment later, Heather heard another quiet gasp. She wanted to cover her eyes as she peeked down to see there was a second circle growing around the first one.

Are you fucking kidding me? She lamented to herself.

Heather had been staring for too long because Paul was now looking at her with terrified eyes. Before her son could say anything, Heather pretended to just notice the 'random' splotches, "Oh, hey, I think some came out." She tried to say it enthusiastically, but it came out in an uneasy tone.

"I'm sorry," Paul stammered. "I didn't mean to- I just happened to be looking at your- I-"

Heather's plan of pretending that the precum was unrelated to her was now in the trash. So she dryly breathed, "Well, it's certainly not a medical issue."

Paul was figuring out what to say in response.

Heather's eyes looked around her son, but never at him. She was already eager to put this behind them. "I'm not mad. Do you think now you can go take care of it in a bathroom and get in your boat on time?"

The son was relieved not to be in trouble. But he hesitated, as he spoke honestly, "I think so. I mean, I might be able to, now. I think I can now. I'll go try."

"No," Heather told him. "'Think you can' isn't good enough. You have to have to be out in that boat soon. You're not going to throw all of your training and your dreams away because you're having a silly problem. I need you to be sure you get rid of it in the bathroom."

The 18-year-old knew his mom was right. And he was frustrated. "I don't- It's just I tried for over a frickin' hour last time, and nothing happened. I tried everything, and nothing works. It didn't feel like I was even getting close."

"Yeah, but maybe now 'the damn broke', so to speak."

"Maybe." Paul was not convinced.

"God," Heather ran her fingers over her eyes and nose. She checked her phone and saw that her son was supposed to be in the water in eight minutes. The bathroom was probably a three-minute jog, and he still had to get his boat off the trailer and walk it to the water. Exacerbated, the mother sighed. "Turn away, and just rub it through your uniform a couple of times and see if it feels any different."

The son was still embarrassed, and now he felt pressure to get results. He turned away and rubbed his pulsating erection. It was sensitive, but nothing happened. It was hard to focus, given the situation.

"It's not going to happen," he said, depressingly. "Screw it. I can't get into the mood to do it."

"You literally just were a few seconds ago," Heather whisper-yelled.

"I can't do it under the pressure! I wasn't thinking when I did it. I just looked and it happened."

Heather took a deep breath and bounced on her toes for a few seconds. Her breasts lightly bounced and rippled under her shirt. Her son once again locked onto her body and released a low grunt. Heather could see another dark, wet mark appearing on his uniform.

The mother looked into the distance and shook her head at what her life currently was.

"I'm sorry. I didn't mea-"

"Fine," Heather interrupted her son's apology. "If you need to look, then look. It's the only way you're going to make the race."

"What do you mean?" There was cautious excitement in Paul's voice.

Heather rolled her eyes again. "It means what you think it means." She carefully scanned the area to make sure nobody could see them in the woods. "Just get it done and over with now."

Her son was taken aback. "Like, right here? Like, take it out, in front of you?"

"No," Heather sternly instructed, "leave it in your uniform and rub. It'll hurt less anyway." Heather then reached down for her clutch. "Here," she offered, holding out some tissues. "Just stick them inside and cover it so it doesn't stain everywhere."

Paul grabbed the tissues and stepped back to where he was. He could not believe this was happening, and neither could Heather. The reality, though, was that there was an incredible amount of time, money, and future on the line, and this seemed like a small, yet awful price to pay for Heather.

The son stuffed the tissues into his tight uniform and covered his cockhead.

Heather looked around another time. She then stared into the distance and started bouncing on her toes. Paul watched his mom's chest jiggling in her bra. He promptly moaned, and some more precum came out.

The mother could hear that it was working. She tried to imagine she was somewhere else and just dancing. But she could hear her son rubbing his polyester suit and panting.

This seemed like a dream for Paul. He had been using his mom's underwear to masturbate almost every day since his 18th birthday, and he could have never dreamt of this opportunity.

After a minute of hearing her son randomly gasp, Heather asked in his direction, "So, are you getting closer?"

He was still sheepish with his responses. "I might be. I can't tell."

"That's not an answer, Paul. Like, is more coming out? Is it coming out more often? This can't take forever."

"I know," he breathed. "It's kind of coming out the same as it was. It feels the same."

Heather sighed and swiveled her head to make sure they were alone. She then began throwing her shoulders into it and bouncing higher on her toes. She placed her palms on the waistband of her pants so she could poorly disguise it as her wriggling into tight pants.

Paul watched mom's breasts sway as they jiggled and bounced more. Paul released a louder moan, and he could feel a steady stream of precum spewing from his mushroom head. She normally gorgeous, and now she was hot.

"Better or worse?" Heather asked, looking off to the side. She was losing track of time and knew she did not have much to begin with.

"Better," Paul breathed, in awe. "I am starting to get there."

Heather continued, and stepped slightly in different directions so he could look at the back of her jeans. She often got compliments on her larger butt, so she desperately thought it could spur him to finish faster. She wanted it to be over. "Are you about to finish?"

"Bit closer..." Paul promised.

"Ok," Heather muttered. She began playing with her hair while she bounced her chest. Her red hair was always a favorite among men. She figured it was an innocent way to get him there.

"Uhh-uhh," her son moaned louder. Paul liked being able to see his mom's exposed neck as he rubbed himself rapidly.

The mother continued her movements for longer until a ringing sound blared from near her son's feet. It snapped Paul out of his trance. He tried to keep going and ignore the alarm, but the sound was annoying for both people.

"What's that alarm? Just turn it off."

"It means I have to get into the water," he announced, ominously. "I'm so close, dammit."

"Just turn it off! Focus again. How far away are you?" Heather peaked to see her son's cock was still firmly erect and throbbing.

"Pretty close, I think. I'm not in that final gear, but I'm close," Paul agonized.

"Then keep going. You can just row faster to the starting line," Heather urged.

Paul followed his mom's instructions. He began rubbing himself again furiously. He wanted to cum to his mom and he wanted to row.

Heather got back into her bouncing and dancing. Paul tried to watch, but he just shook his head in frustration. "I'm not- I just- I'm just thinking about missing the race now. I can't focus."

"Shit," Heather was irritated and flustered. "C'mon. I know you'd rather focus on what my boobs are doing than the race."

"I'm trying! I can't help it."

"Fuck," Heather cursed. She tugged at the top of her shirt, thinking of how on his birthday, Paul had seen her in a v-neck. So, maybe, it might stimulate him. Unfortunately, her shirt was a taut material and revealed next to nothing.

After everything Heather had done over the years of rowing, all the annoyances she had with her husband, all the time she spent dealing with comments from bitchy moms, and now after all she had done so far on this rock, it was unfathomable to her to let her son throw away this opportunity.

Wishing she had a shot of vodka to down first, Heather carefully examined the woods around her once more. She sighed and looked at her son. "Are you ready for me to make you cum, finally?"

Paul was mesmerized by what she could mean.

"You better make the starting platform," Heather cautioned. She reached down and grabbed the bottom of her shirt. She rolled it up her body, exposing her stomach and ribs. "I can't believe I'm doing this," she said aloud, mainly to herself. The mother used her shirt to lift her boobs up and then slid her shirt over them.

Paul watched his mom's bra-cupped breasts drop. He moaned loudly. And he could not stop staring at all of the flesh he had not seen since his birthday, as well as more flesh he did not even see then. The breasts were creamy, firm, and each had a small vein running up the side.

Heather kept her sleeves on, and the shirt stayed rolled above her chest. It was insane that she was willingly exposing herself to her son. This was by far the most ridiculous thing Heather had ever done, but she could not come up with a better solution. She told herself it was like a bikini top.

"Oh my God," Paul gasped.

"Better or worse?" Heather joked, mainly to ease the immense discomfort she was feeling.

Paul smiled. "Way better."

With her son's attention no longer divided, Heather ran her hands along the sides of her chest. She pushed and prodded her cold tits to make them move and ripple. "Are you close?" She asked, hopefully.

Her son nodded. His breaths were getting shorter. "Almost there, ugh. Could you make them bounce more?"

The mother raised her eyebrows. "Excuse me? You should be mind-blown that you get to see this."

"Sorry." Paul hoped he did not sound ungrateful. "My mind is blown. I swear."

Precious seconds ticked away. Heather rolled her eyes and admitted, "I guess you'd know better than I would." She stood tall and swept her hair back behind her head. Heather bounced on her toes much more intensely than before and held the straps still.

Paul watched his mother's glorious breasts bounce and jiggle to the point where they looked like they'd fall out. "I'm about to cum," Paul announced, gasping for breath.

"Good," Heather replied, matter-of-factly, "you have to."

"They're so nice," Paul complimented.

It felt odd to get a compliment on her boobs from her son. She wanted to tell him he was being inappropriate, but that would be like the pot calling the kettle black. "Uh, thanks. I've been told."

"They're like the perfect size," Paul gushed.

Heather wanted to thank her son and say it was enough, but he was clearly getting off on talking to her. She could push him to the edge. "Thank you. I also know how to use them."

Her son loved her response. "I know," Paul panted more. "Your face is so pretty, but it feels so good to be looking at them."

The compliment actually made Heather blush. "If you like looking at them, then fucking cum already, Paul."

With the mention of his name, Paul's entire body jolted. He jerked so much that Heather thought he might stumble off of the boulder. He came profusely. Heather could see his balls tightening in his stretchy uniform, as well as his shaft flexing again and again.

Heather had heard of men getting 'post-nut clarity,' but Heather thought she was getting it herself from watching her son finish. She suddenly looked around her and realized that she was standing on a rock, in the middle of the woods, helping her son ejaculate to her. A sense of panic struck Heather again.

She quickly pulled her shirt down, put her hoodie on, and grabbed her belongings. "Go get to the starting line." Heather then ran down the hill. And nearly ran into someone and barrelled them over.

"Hi, Heather," a father from the rowing team greeted on the main trail, eyebrows raised.

"Can't talk now," she rudely brushed him off.

Heather's mind was spinning. She found the bathroom and washed her face with ice-cold water. What the fuck was I doing?

 Ch. 5

Sitting in a bathroom stall with the door locked, Heather tried to come to grips with what she had done.

When she had been doing it, it all made sense. Even now, as she thought back to see where she went wrong, she could not come up with a different solution that solved the problem.

After thinking through the events again and again, the married mother came to the realization that she may have done the right thing for her son's future and her family, but she felt guilty. She felt guilty for being reckless months ago and being the reason her son was turned on by her. She felt guilty for cheating in her marriage. And she felt guilty that even though she probably just permanently scarred her relationship with her son, her main concern was whether her son would get to the starting line and advance out of his heat.

Heather was beginning to feel claustrophobic in the park bathroom, so she went out into the cool Spring air. She checked her phone to see that her son's race would start any minute now. Being outside the bathrooms near the dock, Heather realized she was in the same area as her husband. There was no way she could look at his face right now.

Instead, Heather hurried back down the river bank to the team canopy. She took deep breaths and put on a straight face.

"It's Paul's heat now, isn't it?" A fellow parent asked Heather curiously, as she approached.

She was understandably a bit off. But Heather picked up the binoculars that she had left resting in her chair and stood on the edge over the water. She peered through the lenses to see a wave of single rowers rowing towards her.

The excitement and competitive nature of the race pulled Heather back from her self-loathing. She looked at the leaders and thought that she had gotten the time wrong because she did not see Paul. Heather scanned the water. And, finally, she saw her son up the river, trailing by nearly ten boat lengths.

Heather's heart dropped. After everything that had happened, he was having his worst race yet. But there was no reason why he would be rowing well, Heather thought. Her son had been masturbating for hours, he had been out in the cool air without a jacket, then he had a physically-draining orgasm, and then he had to burn energy racing to the starting platform.

Gretchen, who was looking through her binoculars, asked with fake seriousness, "Oh, I thought this was Paul's race? I don't see him in there. Did he change heats?"

Ignoring the obnoxious mothers on the "team," Heather looked on. As the race approached the last half, Paul seemed to only be five boat lengths behind. It was still a large gap, especially because the other rowers likely were saving their energy for the final sprint.

The racers were now close enough for Heather to see with her own eyes. Paul was ripping the oars with every toned muscle he had. Slowly, he picked up more steam. In the final quarter of the race, Heather watched her son begin his sprint before any other rower.

Heather could never remember him rowing so powerfully. He closed the gap on the other racers. When the other racers finally began their sprint, Paul did not only keep up but continued to pass them. No way...

In a triumph of passion and hard work, Paul crossed the finish line in second, which was enough to advance to the final on Sunday.

"Great comeback, Paul!" Heather shouted. She knew her son could not hear her, but the other mothers could.

 Ch. 6

It was a moment of celebration for Heather. She was able to take her mind off of the impending consequences of her actions. For the time being, her actions were justified. Because of what she had done, her son was able to advance.

"Tell Paul I said congratulations," one of the more relaxed parents said.

"Oh, thank you. I'll be sure to pass the message on." Heather walked away from the canopy to soak up the feeling on her own. Her head was still in a fog.

"Hi, Heather," another one of the more relaxed parents, called out.

Heather turned to see Eric, who had a son on the team a couple of years under Paul. She immediately realized that he was the person she nearly ran into when hurrying away from the hill.

"Oh, hey, Eric. Listen, I am so sorry about earlier. My mind was in a really weird place."

Eric laughed. "That's okay. I understand." In a more subdued tone, he added, "Congratulations on Paul's race."

"Oh, thank you! But he did all the work. I just got to watch ha-ha. I'll pass the message on."

"Well, he couldn't do it without you."

"Oh, thanks. I guess it's true that they couldn't do it without us. They'd forget to bring the oars unless we reminded them," Heather joked.

Eric laughed. "That's very true. But, really, you especially help your son more than most other moms would."

Heather was not sure what he meant, but she figured he was referring to how she helped out a bit more since her husband was a coach. "Uh, yeah, maybe," Heather shrugged and turned away.

"Well, not 'maybe'," Eric spoke up, "it seems like you definitely know the key to motivating your son. I don't know of any other mom who would do what you do."

Heather's heart dropped to her stomach. Her tone changed. "What do you mean by that?"

Eric nudged. "C' mon. I saw you two in the woods."

It felt as if the world was splitting open under Heather's feet. "I don't know what you're referring to."

The father, in his Patagonia jacket, rolled his eyes. "Don't play dumb. I saw you helping him, uh, stoke the fire."

Heather wanted to come up with a lie, but her brain was on fire, and her face was so red that any lie would be transparent. "What do you think you saw, exactly?"

Eric whispered. "To be honest, I'm not really sure. All I know is that you didn't have a top on, and your son was enjoying it."

"Why are you telling me this?" Heather asked, bluntly.

"Because I can't imagine Rich knows what you do for your son. Rich has been a friend of mine for three years now, and I needed confirmation from looking in your eyes before I told him."

Heather was unnerved and beginning to breathe faster. "He'll never believe you."

"You're right. If I told him what you did then he would probably call me a liar and ban me from the team. But if I show him, well, then you'd have a hard time explaining yourself."

Biting on the cryptic message, Heather demanded, "What do you mean by 'show him'?"

Eric held out his smartphone and opened a short video. It only lasted four seconds, and the video was granular from being zoomed in from afar. But, through the myriad of trees and the pixelated footage, Heather could see her bare stomach and bra exposed. And to the left of the screen was her son, rubbing the front of his uniform. The video was so granular that if Heather did not have her distinct red hair and body type, she could have convinced her husband that it was another woman.

Heather shot her arm out and grabbed the phone. Unfortunately, Eric still had his grip on it. A subdued arm-wrestling match ensued. Being stronger, Eric was able to hold onto his phone and shove it into an inside pocket of his jacket.

"Fucking delete it!"

"I can't. Rich needs to see this."

"You're going to ruin not just my life, but his life too. And Paul's as well."

Eric considered her plea. "You're right. But that's a decision you made. It's a shame, too, because I honestly get no pleasure in showing him or ruining peoples' lives. But I don't think you actually want to stop him from seeing it."

"What are you talking about? Of course, I don't want you to show it to him."

Leaning closer, Eric informed, "Well, if you want me to delete the video, then you and I should go for a walk and talk about it- maybe down the path there and up the hill, maybe stop and talk on the boulder."

Heather leaned away. With a look of disbelief and disgust, she replied, "Are you out of your fucking mind?" She could not believe what the jackass was trying to do. "Whatever perverted fantasies you have in your mind, I can promise you they won't happen."

"See," Eric shrugged, "I knew you weren't interested in stopping Rich from seeing the video."

With defiance, Heather smirked, "You know, I don't think you'd show it to him anyway. Because even if he believes you, he will still remember you as the guy who recorded his wife and son and shared it with him. He'll think of that every time he sees your face, and probably even your son's face."

"Hmm, you might be right," Eric conceded. Heather had given him a new perspective. "I guess it's a game of odds then. If you help me delete the video now, then there's a zero-percent chance of him ever knowing. If you don't, then maybe there's only a 10-percent chance I show him today. But, you have to think about how those odds change. If my son doesn't have a good year next year, or even once he graduates, and I have nothing to lose, those odds could be over 80 percent. If you feel confident enough to have this held over your head every single day for the next couple of years, then I guess we shouldn't go take that walk."

This was a nightmare. This was worse than a nightmare. Heather felt that she was losing control of her life. She felt trapped. The only way out of the cage was to tell her husband herself. It meant that she was in control of the situation, but it would destroy her family and her entire world. Heather scanned his hand for a wedding ring in hopes that she could blackmail him back, but there was nothing. "You're the worst human I've ever met."

"I know this is a shitty thing to do, really," Eric agreed, "but you have no idea how much I want this. So what's it going to be?"

Heather spun around in place, hoping some miraculous force would appear to save her. But she was all alone in this. "What the hell do you want, exactly?" Heather asked, with repulsion. "And I am not fucking you," she whispered, firmly.

The middle-aged man held his hands up defensively. "Woah, Woah! I never said it had to be that. Besides, every time I imagine us having fun together, I imagine that you love giving head."

Heather naturally recoiled. A loathing form of shock was on Heather's attractive face. "Ughh."

"I always am holding your amazing hair back. I'm feeling your tits. I can see over your head and enjoy that perfect booty of yours. You're looking into my eyes as you eagerly suck my dick..." Eric was getting lost in his own fantasy.

"Fuck you, so much," Heather scoffed.

"So... Are we going with Option A then?"

Rolling her eyes, the married mother surrendered, "Fine, I'll put my mouth on your little penis since this is clearly the only way you can get a woman do it to you."

"Great! You can insult me, but I think it will still be amazing. We should go right now."

"No!" Heather interjected. Her head was nowhere near being in the right place, and, luckily, she had an excuse. "Paul's about to get back from his race. It'd weird if I'm not here."

"Ahh," Eric smirked. "I can't wait to see how you celebrate with him."

 Ch. 7

In what was already the most remarkable day in Heather's life, the discomfort just kept on coming.

It had been 20 minutes since Heather had left her conversation with the blackmailing father, and she was still physically reacting. Every few minutes she would think about the conversation and shudder.

Just as Heather began to calm herself down by telling herself that, once again, she was making the most rational decision she could in a bad situation, she looked up and saw Paul approaching the team canopy.

The mother felt even more out of her element than she had when being spoken to by Eric. How was she supposed to react to seeing him? How could she look at him and talk to him? What was she supposed to say? Heather realized that those same questions were likely running through her son's mind.

As usual, when Paul arrived at the team hangout, Heather stood up and walked over to greet him. This time, however, she stepped towards him with caution as one would approach an unfamiliar animal. Paul seemed to be just as unsure.

He had his jacket on and was fidgeting with the cuffs. The mother and son soon felt eyes on them as people began to offer their congratulations. "Congratulations," Heather announced, robotically.

"Thank you," Paul replied to everyone.

The eyes were still on them. Heather soon realized that she and Paul were starting to look strange, keeping their distance from each other. They usually hugged when Paul got back, so Heather raised her arms and stepped towards her son. He hesitantly responded and hugged her back.

Neither of them could remember a more awkward hug. Neither of them knew how long it should last. The answer to that question came quickly, as Heather noticed that something hard was pressing into her stomach from underneath her son's jacket. Her eyes went wide, and she ended the embrace.

She could tell her son wanted to apologize and explain himself, but it was probably better that they were surrounded by people so he would not have the chance.

Heather then noticed that her son was stealing glances of her body. "I think you need to get some food in you!" She forced a cheery attitude.

The mother was excited that Paul was done racing for the day. Of course, being the coach's wife, she had to stay until the team was done.

 Ch. 8

As fantastic as the idea of waiting and agonizing over what she had to do Eric today was, Heather figured it was best to rip it off like a band-aid.

Looking over at her son, Heather reminded herself that everything she was doing today was to help and protect him. She did not need to question whether he appreciated it, because when Heather looked over, she saw his eyes longingly admiring her form. He had made it clear earlier that he appreciated it.

"I am going to run to the bathroom," Heather informed her son. She then walked casually over to Eric, who was seated in his chair. As she trudged by, Heather covertly delivered a swift kick to the bottom of Eric's fabric chair.

"Ahh," he yelped. When he swiveled his head to see what had happened, he saw the back of Heather's attractive body and her long, red hair moving away from him. The man eagerly shot up and followed her away from the canopy.

Eric caught up to Heather near the main trail and asked quietly, "Was that your way of telling me it's go-time?"

"Obviously." Heather said, poignantly, "I wouldn't let any part of my body contact yours unless I had to."

There was no dampening Eric's excitement as he rubbed the palms of his hands together. "I can't believe this is actually happening."

Heather was pissed off. "I'm going to laugh when you lose your load just from me poking it with my finger."

 Ch. 9

After the walk down the trail, they began the walk up the hill. Soon enough, they could see the giant boulder through the woods.

Something suddenly hit Heather. "Wait, you saw Paul and me. Somebody will definitely see us. We can't do it here. We should wait for another day."

"No, no, no," Eric chuckled. "I only saw you because you were on the edge of the boulder. If we're closer to the back then we'll be fine. And besides, you don't really want to risk putting this off, do you?"

Heather cursed under her breath. She followed Eric onto the boulder and stood towards the back. "Look! I can see the trail at the bottom of the hill. That means anybody can definitely see us."

Eric corrected, "No, they will be able to see my neck and head. You'll be down too low for people to see you." He was smiling at his own joke.

"I wonder why you're single..."

With no more concerns to bring up, Heather found herself on the rock alone with a person, who she once considered an acquaintance. Her hands were trembling.

Seeing her nerves, Eric spoke surprisingly sweetly. "Hey, Heather, you don't need to be nervous about this. I know this situation isn't ideal, but you're not about to do something you haven't done before. I'm not going to hurt you. I'm clean. And nothing bad will happen to you while you're up here."

"You're making me cheat on my husband," Heather explained, firmly.

"No, you willingly cheated on your husband with your son and who knows who else. Rich will never know about this, just like after I finish he will never know about what you did with your son. You can hate me all you want for this. You should hate me for this. But you shouldn't be worried. I'm not doing this because I want to be an asshole. I'm doing this because I think you're really fucking hot, and I really want to feel what it's like for you to make me cum."

After listening to Eric's assurances, she admittedly was not scared anymore. Unhappy? Sure. But not scared of there being consequences. And she certainly still hated him. "Fine, let's get this over with and be done with it forever."

"That's the spirit," Eric encouraged.

They both stood there motionless.

"Well... Are you going to take it out?" Heather wondered.

"I think it would be fun if you did it. And I can't really feel your tits with your hoodie on."

Heather gave him the finger. It just so happened that it was practical to take her hoodie off so she could kneel on it.

"Oh my god, they're much bigger than I expected," Eric chimed. "You hide them well."

"I guess I don't want perverts like you staring at them." Heather secretly felt bad for implying her son was also a pervert because he was the real reason she started hiding them.

With her hoodie dropped in front of her, Heather then sighed and, for the second time that day, lifted her gray long underwear over her chest. This time, though, she took it all the way off. She quickly dropped down so nobody could see her naked upper body.

"Holy shit, you're gorgeous," Eric exhaled. He instinctively reached for the tent in his jeans and began massaging it. "And I really like white bras."

"Lucky you, asshole. And I think you'll be surprisingly disappointed with this blowjob."

"You know," Eric pointed out, "I am very confident that you know exactly what you're doing. You don't go through college with a body and confidence like yours and not end up doing this all the time. If you think you're going to stick it me by giving bad head, remember that the worse the head is, the longer my dick is going to be in your mouth."

Heather reached out and unbuckled his belt and unzipped his jeans. "I think this has happened to you so few times that I could give you the worst head ever and you'd still lose it in the first minute."

Heather tugged Eric's jeans down and found herself staring at his yellow boxers. He was already erect, but he was not small enough for her to make fun of him. She just yanked the boxers down saw herself staring at his hard cock.

Every fiber of her body was restraining her from getting near it, but she knew she had to overcome. Before Heather could move in, she suddenly felt two hands on her breasts and cups. "Woah!" She swiped the hands away.

"Hey, that was part of the arrangement."

"I know," Heather agreed. "But give me a moment to get settled." She fought her intuition and reached out to poke the bare skin of Eric's cock. It wobbled, but nothing came out.

"Aww, it looks like you're going to have to suck it. Darn!"

Heather looked at his face and rolled her eyes. She placed her hands on his shaft. It was warm and felt alien to her. It had been a long time since she had done this to another man. She lightly stroked it, giving it one hard pump.

"Ahhh!" Eric shouted. He did not cum, but at least Heather had hurt it.

"Sorry, I forgot that ones that never see any action can be delicate."

"I think you should stop hesitating and just put your mouth on it. It'll be better for both of us once you do."

"Fuck you." Heather angled the white shaft and its pink head towards her mouth. She hesitantly parted her lips, closed her eyes, and went for it.

"Wait!"

Heather halted and looked up.

"I want you to look at me while you do it, remember? And at least pretend to be enjoying it. I won't get off otherwise."

Smacking her forehead, Heather displayed a spiteful smile with her mouth and eyes. She continued to look at Eric's face as she went in again and let his cockhead into her mouth.

The feeling of her saliva on his dick sent shivers down Eric's spine. Heather darted her tongue out a few times like she was wading into cold water. She sadly knew she'd need to get her tongue involved.

Seeing the enjoyment in Eric's eyes made her hate him even more. There was no way of her hiding the hatred in her eyes.

She could not ruin his experience by giving him bad head without also making herself suffer. The only way Heather knew she could ruin his experience was to finish him off before he could really savor it.

Knowing he was expecting her to begrudgingly fight him every step of the way, Heather surprised him by pulling her head back. She then lowered her head and began licking his package, from his testicles to the tip of his shaft. She twirled her tongue around on top to get hit his most sensitive skin.

"Ohh fuck," Eric moaned. He did not know what had hit him. Within 30 seconds he was about to blow.

Heather knew she had him. But to her frustration, Eric grabbed the back of her red hair and separated her mouth from his erect cock.

"Fuck ha-ha," he laughed. "You are better than I imagined. I'm glad to see you're going all out, but I really want to feel your tits before I cum."

Defeated in this battle, Heather sighed, "Then just put your hands on them and do it. I told you to do it once I got going."

"You're going to need to take your bra off for me to really enjoy them."

This comment was not a surprise for Heather. She actually thought he was going to say something earlier. "I'm not going to do everything for you. If you know how to take a bra off then you can do it. If not, then oh well."

Heather went back in. Eric had one hand on the back of her head and the other was tugging at her bra straps. It turns out he did know how to do it, because after just getting going again, Heather had to stop to take her arms out of her bra loops.

Eric's warm hands pinched and massaged her breasts in the cool air.

"Happy now? Can I keep going and end this?"

"Absolutely," he smiled.

Dedicated to getting it over as soon as possible, Heather rhythmically bobbed her head in and out. She cupped his balls in her hand and squeezed them, hoping to end him.

As the blowjob progressed, Eric moaned more and his left hand squeezed her boobs harder while his right hand held her head firmer. The entire time, Heather stared daggers into his eyes. That did not concern Eric, though, as feeling her incredible breasts and running his hand through her red hair while she pleasured him was a dream come true.

"Your ass looks amazing when you're on your knees," Eric cooed, looking over her head.

Heather just rolled her eyes at him. "Are you close yet?" She feigned exhaustion.

"If you want me to cum, try using your tongue again- it was amazing."

After a long lick with her tongue, the redhead asked quizzically, "And speaking of that, where the hell do you think you're going to cum?"

"I wanna cum in you m-"

"Don't say my mouth because it's not gonna happen. Nowhere in or on me is going to happen. You can cum on the ground."

"Oh, come on... When have you ever made a guy do that?"

"Today. Today is the first time ever. And take your hand off my head. I need to be able to pull away, and I don't want you stopping me."

"Me holding your head was part of the deal."

"I don't care. I know you're going to hold my head in so you can cum in my mouth. Keep your hands off."

"Fine. But if you're going to make me keep my hands off then I get to cum on your tits."

"How about no?"

"What? Why not? You know I won't cum in your mouth, and I get to see my cum running down your tits. It's a fair compromise. C'mon. Just do this and we're done. I delete the photos."

Heather stared at her hands, which her slowly massaging his shaft to keep it 'excited'. "I hope you know this is the last time I'm talking to you."

"So, deal?"

"Yes," Heather growled. She immediately got back to work with her tongue. She deeply lathered her pink tongue into his flesh. Eric was moaning uncontrollably. Heather could see in his face that he was close. She used her index finger and thumb to hold the skin of his shaft in place at his base while she sucked the top.

Eric's muscles began to twitch. Heather pulled her head away and removed her hands from his shaft. She unenthusiastically held her boobs out. With a final grunt, Eric fired ropes and spurts of cum onto her flesh. One rope got dangerously close to her face, but it only hit her neck.

As Eric lurched over and tried to catch his breath, Heather reached into his jeans pocket and nabbed his phone. She grabbed his thumb and placed it on the fingerprint reader. Eric knew what she was doing, so he did not care. After going into his photos, Heather deleted the video and made sure there were no others. She emptied his trash to make sure it was gone.

The relieved mother carelessly tossed Eric's phone on the rock as she stood up.

"Thank you so much. You're amazing."

"I know," Heather remarked, coolly. She stared at the semen running down her neck and chest. She then picked her pine-needle-covered hoodie off of the boulder and removed her clutch. She moaned from realizing she only had one tissue left after giving the rest to her son. "You wouldn't have any tissues, perhaps?"

"I thought you weren't going to speak to me again, after this?" Eric cracked. He then went into his jacket and removed a bandana.

All cleaned up, Heather put her shirt and her hoodie back on. "You stay here for a bit. I'm not walking back with you." Just glad to be done with that ordeal, Heather walked back to the team canopy.

It was odd sitting next to her son in a chair and watching the races. In his mind, he was likely still thinking of everything they had done earlier. Heather had to deal with the weight of that, as well as process the experience she just had.

The mother and son sat in silence for nearly three hours until Paul finally peered in his mom's direction and whispered, "Um, thank you for earlier. I got to row because of you. Just, uh, thank you." He then faced forward again.

A warm wave of emotion swept over Heather. It did not change what she had done, what Eric had done to her, or the implications of it all, but her son's genuine appreciation made her feel at peace with her decisions. "You're welcome. We don't need to talk about it anymore."

 Ch. 10

The short drive home that evening was surprisingly comfortable. Rich, Heather, and Paul were all in the car together. None of them spoke. Paul and Heather both fell asleep in their seats under the warmth of the car's hot air, and it allowed them to forget about the day.

------Part Two------

 Ch. 11

Sunday morning was hectic, as Rich had to perform logistics on which rowers made it to the finals of the regional races. Paul tried to keep his focus on his diet and race-day routines. Heather was excited for her son's race because all he needed to do was get third to go to Nationals. And she was confident he could do that. Of course, she also could not shake the impending emotions that would come from being back to the same place where she had all of those dramatic experiences the day before.

Regardless of how prepared each member of the Gaines family was to face the day, it was almost 6 am, and it was time to leave. The one benefit of leaving so early was that Heather was too tired to let her mind race.

 Ch. 12

The river banks looked the same as they did before. Today, however, the poles of the tents and canopies were testing the limits of their ground stakes as gusts of wind howled across the choppy water.

It was not a good day for rowing. But barring a long thunderstorm, there was no chance of the races getting canceled. Even though the quality of the championship races would be hindered, it was set to be a much shorter day with fewer rowers and parents. Of course, the types of parents who got on Heather's nerves were there since their children tended to be the best rowers.

The Gaines family was there first for their team, which was usual. Soon other parents and rowers showed up. Not eager to speak to any of them, Heather walked along the water and watched rowers practice against the high chop. They were getting blown off course, had water filling their shells, and oars getting caught in the water. She hoped that Paul would be able to power through.

The morning was even colder than the day before due to the wind. Heather was anxious about Paul's race, which was not for another four hours. Instead of hanging around the team canopy and dealing with the likes of Gretchen and Mary, Heather walked up and down the river and along the trails. Whenever she got cold she would just duck into the heated bathroom.

After being alone for two hours, in what would soon become a poor decision, Heather decided to return to the canopy to eat.

"Mornin', Heather," a warm voice greeted her as she grabbed a muffin.

"Oh, hey, Abel. Couldn't ask for a better day, could we?" They both laughed.

As Heather walked over to her chair to eat her chocolate muffin, Mary commented, "Ah, is that another one?"

"No," Heather put on a nice face, "but even if it were, there's nothing wrong with living a little bit."

Mary pursed her lips. "I wasn't talking about the muffin." She then motioned her head towards Abel, who was an older father, "Someone certainly does like to 'live a little'."

Not even knowing how she could respond or what Mary was referring to, Heather just went to sit down in her chair. She assured herself it was paranoia, but she had a sinking feeling it had something to do with something she did the day before.

Despite her vow to never speak to Eric again, the moment she saw him walking his dog along the trail, Heather practically ran to him.

"Hi, Heather. I'm surp-"

"Shut the fuck up. Did you tell anyone about what you made me do to you?"

He was confused and defensive. "Well, firstly, you chose to do that so you could hide a secret. And secondly, no, of course not."

"Thank god," Heather exhaled.

Eric assured, "Honestly, I only told Sean about it. But I-"

"What the fuck!" Heather spoke so loudly it turned heads of passersby.

Eric spoke quietly, "But, but, I told him to never tell anyone. And I swear I never brought up the thing with you and Paul. I will take that to my grave."

His assurances did not stop Heather's head from spinning. The problems in her life were becoming a ripple effect. One small gesture to help her son was resulting in larger and larger problems.

"You fucking moron. After what I fucking did for you? Seriously?! You know he's already told a bunch of people." Heather was tearing up. Her reputation and her marriage seemed to be hanging by threads.

"I'm sorry. I don't think he's going to tell anyone."

"Why the hell not? It was pretty fucking obvious you weren't supposed to tell anyone, but that didn't stop you. And I think Mary already knows, which means Gretchen knows, which means everyone is about to fucking know. My husband is going to hear it."

Eric felt awful for his carelessness. He simply could not resist bragging to his friend. "I'm sorry. I know this seems bad, but I swear if anyone asks me, I'll deny it."

Head in her palms, Heather explained, "It doesn't matter. Even if most people think it's not true, they're still going to associate this story with me."

"I get why you'd care if people know. But it's not as bad as people believing a false rumor about you."

Seeing the flames in Heather's green eyes, Eric knew his advice was no longer welcome. He backpedaled and walked away with his dog.

Heather walked back toward the team camp and soon realized that the wind was not the only thing that was swirling. She noticed some of the women and many of the men looking up at her in a way she had not seen before. She wondered if it was all in her head, but she saw women mouthing words to others around them.

Heather sat down, feeling alone. She could feel the eyeballs on her. She did not know what the rumors were, but she actually wanted to. She hoped she could somehow combat or disprove the rumors.

She had only been sitting for a few minutes before she got back up again to leave the area. She wanted to turn the rest of the world off. She found herself walking down the trail again, fighting tears.

"Hey, Heather."

Heather looked up to see friendly faces. It was Doug and Isabel, a couple whose son rowed for the varsity boat. They rarely came to races because of work conflicts, so they were not part of the in-crowd.

"Hi, Doug. Hi, Isabel."

"Are you alright?" Isabel asked. "You seem a little worried."

Swallowing, the redhead asked, "Well... This might seem like a weird and childish question, but have either of you heard any rumors about me?"

Doug and Isabel immediately looked at each other in an unsure way. They both peered in the direction of the team canopy, almost to see if anyone was watching them talk to Heather. "Um..."

"You can be honest. Please, tell me," Heather pleaded.

"Honestly, yes," Isabel replied. "We don't think it's true," Doug added.

"And what was the rumor?" The couple seemed hesitant, so Heather assured, "You can tell me."

"Again, we don't believe a word of it, and we certainly aren't helping to spread it. But, some people are saying you had fun with some of the dads on the team and also a lot of dads on other teams."

Heather wanted to throw up. She felt weak in the knees.

"I'm so sorry, I didn't want to say it. I feel so bad for you. People are so jealous and vicious."

"No, no, it's okay." The mother tried to pull herself together. "What do you mean by 'fun' exactly?" The couple was hesitant again. "Please, I need to know what people are saying so I can defend myself."

Isabel gritted her teeth and whispered, "Uh, oral sex."

"Oh, fantastic," an overwhelmed Heather replied, sarcastically. Her hands were on her head and she was breathing deeply.

"Don't worry. It's obviously not true, and we will be sure to defend you if anyone brings it up," Doug promised.

"Thank you. Thank both of you." Heather walked away.

 Ch. 13

Somehow, today was even more twisted than the day before. Heather was not just upset; she was angry. She bit her lip around these people for years, and now they happily spread rumors that she blew half the local rowing community. She knew she was an easy target. She had the attractive face, the sexy body, the smooth voice, and the social status that made the rumors feel plausible.

She felt that she was still paying for one decision that she had made months ago when she thought she was home alone.

Heather knew her husband would almost certainly get a whiff of the rumors. Her marriage could collapse. She could not imagine the impact it could have on her life, and more importantly, her son's.

It bothered her that people thought she was a cheater. From her evolving standpoint, she did not even cheat.

What she had done for her son was essential for his future, and there was no way around it. Is her son another man? Of course. But, when Paul was born, Rich and Heather promised to do whatever they could to give him the best life possible and that either of them would be willing to sacrifice their lives for their son. So surely something less drastic would be acceptable. Did she have to do what she did with Eric? No. But the only other option was Eric showing that video to Rich and possibly others. It could have ruined the life of each and every person in the family. What had she done that was a betrayal to the family?

Now, armed with her new understanding of the rumors, Heather walked back to the canopy and the surrounding camp of chairs. She received the same stares and whispers, but she soon realized that nobody was going to say anything to her face. And standing up and making an announcement about how she did not blow a bunch of random men did not seem like an effective way to restore her reputation.

Eating her stress away at the food table, Heather bit into her second chocolate muffin.

"Hello, again."

"Hey, Abel. Is your day going well?"

"It is! How's yours going?"

"To be honest, it could be a lot better."

"Hmm," Abel mused. He then leaned in and whispered, "If you're looking to turn the day around, I'm always available." He smiled and then walked away.

Heather dropped her muffin on the table and sprinted all the way to the bathroom, tears in her eyes. Sitting on the toilet, Heather's body was numb. She could not believe that this was her life now. She was so angry. She was so angry that people thought they could treat her however they wanted. She was feeling like a pawn instead of a person.

Her phone suddenly buzzed. The mother cracked a smile. She could see it was from Paul, who had a way of making her laugh when she was down. This time, however, his text message had the opposite effect.

"Hey, mom. I don't know if this is okay for me to say, but I am having the problem again."

"Ok... Why are you telling me?"

"I don't think I'll be able to row again."

Even him now?! Fuck! Fuck! Fuck! Why? Perhaps learning the true colors of the world sharpened Heather's senses, but she quickly replied, "Then fix it yourself Paul. How dare you try to take advantage of me after all I did!"

"I SWEAR this is not a joke. I can't get rid of it."

"Then it looks like you're throwing Princeton away or you'll have to let everyone see you have a hardon. Don't EVER message me again about this."

Heather was so pissed off that she considered not even watching his race. But the competitive side of her would not let her do that. And, besides, part of Heather was willing to admit that this was a problem of her own making.

 Ch. 14

An hour later, an alarm on Heather's phone went off. It was one she had set after thinking she had missed Paul's race from the day before. Heather ran out of the bathroom and towards the water. She did not want to watch with the rest of the parents.

She did not have her binoculars, but she could recognize her son's uniform. The race had started, and all of the rowers were having issues in their smaller boats. In a remarkable scene, one rower was blown off course into another rower, essentially knocking each of them out of the race.

Paul now just needed to finish in the top half of rowers. His prospects were not good. Even as a Freshman, Heather could not remember Paul rowing so poorly. She knew he was competent at rowing in chop. He was simply having an off race.

It almost made Heather laugh- how ridiculous things were that after everything she had been through, and everything she had done, it would result in nothing. She felt she deserved it. Paul was in fifth. As the rowers passed, Heather could see from his body language that he was having a rough go of it and was not going to have another miraculous sprint.

The rowers grew distant as they approached the finish line. But Heather did not need to be close to the action to see the massive mistake the rower in second place made. His oar had caught the top of a wave and gotten caught, what was called 'catching a crab'." His entire shell spun around as he tried to dig his oar out of the water.

Then, on the sprint, another rower caught a crab while bringing the oars back too low when he was moving quickly. Heather could not see who was where. All she could see was Paul, the second-slowest racer of the day, passing two rowers towards the finish line. Did he really just get third?

Heather found herself running down the bank. She was simultaneously checking her phone to see if the results of the race had been posted. They were. He did it.

It may have been the most undeserved third place of all time, but it did not matter. Paul was going to Nationals.

 Ch. 15

It had been nearly 45 minutes since Paul's race, and he had not returned to the team's canopy. Heather wondered where he was. It was possible he was mad at her for not helping. If that was the case, then he was being entitled, because he clearly got rid of it on his own.

Heather texted her husband to ask where their son was.

"I think he's in a tent warming up but you might wanna let him be alone for a while."

"Why's that?"

"Well... He had a problem 'down there' and a bunch of other rowers saw it. Don't tell him I told you."

Shit. Heather felt like the worst mother in the world. Her son, who had never acted entitled or spoiled before, had told her about a problem he had- a problem she probably caused- and she had called him a user and a liar. No wonder he looked uncomfortable rowing. What that fuck's wrong with me? He probably got hard again thinking about what I did to him before the last race. Why'd I think he was lying? He swore to me he wasn't. Shit!

Disregarding her husband's advice. Heather walked over to the team tents. Camping tents were scattered about away the canopies and were just sheltered places that could hold four or five rowers to keep them warm.

Heather inspected each one for a silhouette of a person. Finally, she noticed one that was occupied. "Paul?" Heather called.

"Yes," he responded, after a delay.

"Hi. Can you open up?"

"No."

"Okay." Heather knew all of the other tents were empty after checking. Still she whispered. "I just want to say that I'm sorry for saying all of those things to you. I should have believed you. It's just- I have been having a rough day and was in an angry place. I should have taken you seriously. You deserve to be taken seriously."

"I had to pick my boat up over my head to carry it. I thought if my oars were in front of me nobody would notice. They did though. Now everyone is teasing me and talking about me." Paul was not crying, but he was low.

"If you're mad at me and it makes you feel any better, I've been going through something similar today."

"I'm not mad at you," Paul sighed.

"Maybe you should be," Heather replied. "You've never lied to me before about something serious like this. I mean, I don't know if I would have done anything again, but I could have walked in front of you to the water at least. We could have talked about it. I let you down. I know this problem was because of what I did yesterday, I-"

"No, mom," Paul interrupted. "It's not about yesterday. I always think about you. This problem happens all the time."

Heather swallowed. She did not know why this was heavy information. Deep down she had to have known that he had never stopped looking at her the way he had on that night. Heather returned, "Well, you've never missed a race because of it before. Or had this issue during a race."

"No. I've always been able to get rid of it."

"Well, then why was this weekend different?" Heather could hear her son shudder in the tent.

He was strong, but this had to be difficult. "Because the wash was done on Friday night."

"Um... okay, you lost me."

"Mom," Paul exhaled, "I always use your underwear for it. I couldn't do it yesterday when I tried without them."

The thought made Heather's arms and legs twinge. Concern flashed over her. "Wait, like only the dirty ones? Or do you ever go into the drawer?"

"Just dirty," he mumbled.

Heather ran her hands over her face. She took a few deep breaths. "Okay, okay. I can see that point about the laundry and it being a problem. But didn't you- I mean- I wore panties yesterday..."

"They didn't work today," Paul admitted.

"Why not?"

"I don't know. I think it was just after what we did in the woods, it just wasn't the same."

Heather felt awful for her son's situation, especially after learning she had contributed to it. She also realized she rolled up her top for her son and shook her breasts when all she needed to do was go into the bathroom and hand him her underwear.

"I see. Is there anything else you do in regards to me? I promise I won't be mad. I really want to understand so I don't make mistakes."

Paul exhaled. "Um, yeah. I always think about you and look at you in the house. I look at your photos a lot on Facebook, like the ones where you're wearing the type of stuff you used to wear. And, I actually broke up with Kennedy because I just kept thinking about you."

Heather could hear her son breathe, and from what she could tell, it seemed that a weight had been lifted off his shoulders. Paul checking her out was not a surprise, but hearing that he broke up with her friend's daughter because of her was hard to hear. "Ok, thank you for telling me. And you noticed that I dress differently now?"

"Yeah. I think that's why I lost it so easily when I saw you in a tight shirt yesterday."

"That makes sense, I suppose. Well, I have to think about- well- everything. And you can stay in there as long as you'd like. Just text me and I'll bring you some food if you want."

"Thank you."

"And, oh yeah, congratulations on Nationals!"

"Yeah, ha-ha. Thanks, mom."

 Ch. 16

Monday was well received by Heather. She could not remember the last time she was this excited to get to the workweek. She did not have to see the rowing parents for five days. She got to leave a world where had a reputation as a harlot.

That was what Heather had expected. Monday and Tuesday were lovely, but after she got home from work on Wednesday, she was surprised to see Rich sitting in the kitchen. He should have been coaching the rowers after school.

"Hey, Hun, what are you doing home?"

"Heather, can you sit down and talk for a moment?"

There was no doubt over what it was about. The only wildcard was going to be his reaction. And that was mainly dependent on how much credence he gave to the rumors. "Um, yeah, sure. What about?"

"Look, there's no easy way to bring it up, so I'm just gonna shoot straight. I heard a rumor about you that you have been doing sexual things with other men at rowing events."

Heather appeared shocked. "What?! From whom? Who the hell is saying this?"

"Apparently a bunch of people. I want to believe it's a rumor, but I've heard it from some parents I've known for a long time."

"If a bunch of people are saying it, then you know it's a fun rumor made up by some parents that hate me. You know the things they make up. Do you honestly believe any of it could be true?"

"I know some of them don't like you. My first reaction was that they were crazy. But then I thought more about it. You've spent tons of time on your own at these events. I'm not with you. Paul's races only take 20 minutes of your attention a day. Parents from these other schools don't know you. The opportunity has always been there."

Heather's hands were balled into fists under the kitchen table. If her husband had been accusing her of giving one guy a blowjob, it would be fair enough. The fact that he actually thought she had been spending every weekend voluntarily blowing hoards of men made her want to deck him. "I can't believe you think that's even possible."

"Do you have any way of proving it wrong?"

"What?!" Heather gawked, "How on Earth would I prove I haven't fooled around with dozens of men? Am I supposed to go around with a lie-detector test and interview every single man and show you the results?"

"Let me ask you very clearly- Have you ever cheated on me?"

"No," Heather answered, firmly.

"Ok. I am choosing to believe you right now. If I ever find out you did, we're done. There is no excuse you can make up or lie you can tell that would cover for it. And if you ever did anything with a crew parent, oh my god, Heather, you'd be making my life a living hell. The parents on our team are really moral people if you haven't noticed. So in addition to having to leave you, I'd lose my job."

Her husband's words were digging deeper and deeper into Heather's skin. She could not believe that he would immediately believe a rumor based on no evidence on the words of strangers over his own wife.

She remembered that message from Gretchen in August and said nothing about it. For the first time, Heather wanted to know the truth. She wanted to know if her husband was a hypocrite, so that way she could at least walk away from the table knowing everything he said meant nothing.

"I have never cheated on you. And, by the way, the precious, moral parents that you trust so much are not nearly as 'moral' as you'd think. I know for a fact that Gretchen has fooled around with a member of the coaching staff." Heather immediately saw her husband's pupils dilate. She had her answer.

Rich swallowed. "Well, uh, maybe you're right about those parents not being moral. I should have trusted you, I'm sorry. I know you'd never do anything like that, just like I would never do anything like that. I'll be sure to investigate that stuff with Gretchen. That's unacceptable."

 Ch. 16

The conversation with Rich may have been resolved in Heather's favor, but it did not make her feel any better. She realized she was in an unfaithful marriage- really on both sides. She was still furious how ready her husband was to believe something so improbable and then mention leaving her for something he had also done, and under selfish circumstances at that.

Heather needed a drink, and she needed a friend. That was when Heather realized that she was out of wine, and she was out of friends. None of the rowing parents wanted to get close to her now. She worked in an office with only a 64-year-old woman that still accidentally called her 'Harieta' after five years of knowing her. And recently, in light of her son dumping her daughter, Heather's best friend had been phasing her out of her life.

Rich had gone back to coach practice. Heather was both alone and lonely. The season was almost over, but she knew the "voluntary" summer season was coming up, which Paul would be a part of to stay in shape for college. And every weekend, she would be putting up with the same crap. And even after that, after Paul went away to school, she was still the coach's wife. She would have to show up to plenty of events. And how would her marriage function after everything that came out today?

The front door opened. Paul getting dropped off at home from practice reinvigorated Heather. She may not have had many people to talk to. But Heather always had Paul. He was still wearing his unisuit with shorts underneath.

Heather sat up. "Hey, Sweety, how was practice?"

"It went really well."

Heather was surprised to hear that after how dejected he looked the previous two days. "That's great. Did the teasing finally stop?"

"In a way."

"What does that mean?"

"Well, you know, I knew they'd never stop. So, I just told them all I like to masturbate before races because it makes me row faster, and that last race all the bathroom stalls were taken up."

"They bought that??"

"Yeah. They thought it was funny. We laughed about it. And that was that. I figured they can't make fun of me if I'm in on it and show I'm fine with it."

"You're fine with being known as the guy who masturbates before races to row faster?"

Paul chuckled. "It's better than being the guy who got an embarrassing erection. And, I also realized it's now true that I row faster."

Heather evaluated. "I guess that's a good point. And how long have you been doing that before races?"

"Uh," the son awkwardly bit his lip, "I never really did it right before a race until this last weekend."

"Oh..." The mother could feel the discomfort in the room. "But, wait, you only did it once right before a race. On Saturday you did it once, and that wasn't on purpose. Then on Sunday, you didn't do it at all. And, to be honest, Sweety, neither of those races was your best. Saturday, you were slow out of the gate and made up for it with an amazing sprint. Sunday, you were kind of lucky to advance."

Defending his hypothesis of improved performance to his mom, Paul explained, "Exactly. On Sunday, I didn't do anything beforehand and I was stiff in the boat. On Saturday, after I did it, I felt kind of depleted. But my testosterone started flowing again towards the end of the race, and it was like a bolt of electricity. I ended up rowing the best clip of my career."

Heather rolled her eyes. "I think this is all in your head, Paul. That 'bolt of electricity' could have been just from you hitting the wall and your natural adrenaline kicking in. I doubt it was from things kind of waking up again. If it was from testosterone, then Sunday would have been your best race yet. It was all still in your system and flowing then."

At this point, Paul was annoyed that his mom did not believe him. "It was not in my head. On Saturday, literally everything left the chamber beforehand. I had nothing inside of me, which felt good and helped me feel less stressed and more in the zone. But I was tired. Then suddenly, during the race, when things were able to work again, I got hard again, and I went on a tear."

Heather was about to doubt whether he had actually gotten hard again during the race so that he would miraculously go faster. Then she remembered when he hugged her afterward and he was hard. "Ok," she admitted, "I don't doubt that getting hard during the race helped you. But, then why risk pleasuring yourself beforehand? Why not just touch it a little or think about something right before the start?"

"Well again, I think the relief beforehand relieved me of my stress and cleared my mind."

Heather shrugged, "I guess the more power to you, then."

"So, anyway," Paul asked, "how are things with you? You actually seem a little worn down."

"You would be right about that. I've been dealing with a lot lately."

"Oh, yeah? Like what?"

"Uh, it mainly just stems from an issue that I'm having with some crew parents. I don't want to get into it, but I'll just say that they can be vicious and hurtful."

Paul immediately shrunk back and scratched his head. "Yeah, that's true," he spoke vaguely.

"Why? What did you hear?"

"Just stupid stuff."

"Paul, tell me what you heard. And who did you hear it from?"

The son knew she would not rest until she got the information from him. "A couple of the guys told me that there was a rumor that you were kind of doing stuff with some of the dads."

"God," Heather groaned. "Now even the kids are hearing it? Did they say which dads?"

Paul was not enjoying answering the questions. "Um, yeah. They said a couple from other schools and maybe a couple on our team." He quickly added, "For the record, I don't think you'd ever do something like that with one of my friend's dads."

"Thank you!" Heather was glad that someone did not think she would be so much of a harlot that she would do that. "And wait, what about dads on the other teams?"

The son hesitated. "I mean, I've never seen anyth- No, no. I would say you would never do that either."

"Be honest. I won't be mad," Heather promised.

"I- uh- Well, after what you did for me, it seemed like you were comfortable in like a random, new situation like that," he weighed.

"I seemed comfortable to you?!"

"Well, not totally. But, I guess what I mean to say is that I can't imagine any other of the mom's doing that. I'm not saying it's wrong. I thought it was good. I'm just saying that you'd probably be the only one willing to do it."

Heather would have never guessed her son viewed it in that way. And, the thing was, he was probably right. What she did was not something most types of women or moms would even imagine doing. "That might be true. But I can honestly say I have never done anything with dads on other teams. And what I did with you was a spur-of-the-moment, no-other-possible-options thing."

"Ok. If it's worth anything, I don't think I would've judged you for it. I don't know what your and dad's situation is these days," Paul shrugged. "And, I'm only asking because you said 'dad on another team,' but- You've never done anything with a dad on our team, right?"

Somehow it was harder to look her son in the eye than it was her husband. "Uh-" The words got caught in Heather's mouth. Horror appeared on her son's face. "It's not what you think," she pleaded.

"Seriously?!"

"Paul, please listen. I had to do it."

"You 'had' to?"

"Yes. I didn't want to tell you and scare you, but Eric, Cody's dad, he saw us."

Paul was now scared for another reason. "Like, when we were...?"

"Yes. Believe me, I didn't want to do it. It was the only way I could make sure nobody would ever find out. You have nothing to worry about now."

"Wow," was all Paul could muster.

"Yep. And he told someone else about the blowjob, and now, naturally, everyone thinks I'm a whore that's blown half the teams' dads."

Paul was still processing what he had just learned. "I can't believe you'd do that. I guess, thank you."

Heather shrugged. "Of course, I was willing to do whatever it took."

There was guilt in Paul's voice. "I'm so sorry. This is all my fault. I shouldn't have let you do what you did for me to begin with."

"No, don't say that. I made the decision myself. I should be apologizing that you now have to deal with my reputation like I do. It's going to be a long road to put the rumors behind me and for people to think of me the way they used to. And since all of my decisions seem to be backfiring lately, how about you give me some advice. Do I just ignore everyone and wait until they stop talking about it, or do I fight it?"

Paul seemed to be having a debate in his own head. He thought for some time before admitting, "I don't think you can fight it, mom. I mean, just think about it. A lot of the moms on the team want to believe you're a slut because they don't like you and want to think you're beneath them. And a lot of the dads want to believe you're a slut because it lets them think they have a shot. The more you deny it, the more they'll talk about it and want to believe it's true."

"Hmm," Heather was impressed with her son's advice. "I think you're right. I tend to ignore things like this and let them pass, anyway."

"Well," Paul mentioned, "I don't think that works as well as you think. Like, with small things it's definitely true. But with big things, ignoring them makes things much worse."

"You really don't think they'd forget over time? I think they'd get bored of it. Then I'll be free of it for good." Heather sounded optimistic.

"I mean, it's not a rumor if one dad actually got a blowjob and other ones know it's probably true. People never forget about sex stuff. Like, look at us."

Heather changed her positioning on the couch. "What does that have to do with us?"

The 18-year-old was exacerbated with his mom. "I don't wanna bring it up, but think about it. You did this with my birthday. I saw you, and instead of us talking about it, you wanted to ignore it. And now, all this time later, all these problems are happening. You literally changed your entire way of dressing and how you talked to me because you wanted me to forget. I've been sneaking into your hamper every morning for your underwear and secretly checking you out and constantly living in fear of getting caught. That's crazy! I will never forget seeing you drop onto that chair like that. I will always think of you in a sexual way. Instead of working through it, you wanted to ignore it. We will never 'be free' of that problem. And you're never gonna be free of this one."

The dust settled. And Heather was processing her emotions. Everything her son had said was right. She had never done anything to work through the impact of her interaction with Paul. She tried to ignore something that could never be forgotten. And now, she was not going to be able to change what people thought of her, because people would always believe and remember a crazy story that was based on a nugget of juicy truth.

"Thank you for the advice, Paul. I actually think you have a lot of good points. And, hey, I can't remember us ever talking this openly before. I kind of like it. Thank you for being the one brave enough to put yourself out there and open things up."

Paul beamed. "Thanks. But, I think you did the bravest thing when you helped me in the woods." The son and mother laughed. "That's actually how I knew how to beat the problem of everyone making fun of me with the boner. Even though you had to help me get over my nerves, once I finally was comfortable masturbating in front of you, it stopped feeling like our situation was something that was just happening to me. It felt like something I could accept and work through, and I finally stopped feeling like a victim."

Heather looked at her son. He was taller, his jawline was sharp, his muscles were filling in, and he had confidence. Listening to him talk made Heather proud of the man she had raised.

Suddenly, keys jangled outside the front door. It was Rich getting home from the boathouse. Paul realized he still hadn't showered and had been standing in the doorway. He hurried upstairs while Heather greeted her husband.

------Part Three------

 Ch. 17

Friday evening was chaotic. After school and work were done for the week, Paul and Heather had to get right home and start packing. Rich was fielding phone calls from parents to answer logistical questions. With it being a holiday weekend, the family had a six-hour drive ahead of them to the hotel where they would be staying while at Nationals.

It was an anxious time for everyone. Rich had a number of his rowers competing for a national championship. Paul simply went through his race strategy in his head over and over again. Heather had her mind on her son's races, as well as her insights from her last big conversation with him.

Rich rounded up the family. "Alright. Everyone ready?! We can get there by midnight if we leave now."

The Gaines family began their quest to Nationals.

When they arrived at the hotel, Rich and Heather went into their room and passed out. Paul had to go up a couple more floors and find the room he was sharing with a teammate.

 Ch. 18

From the moment his alarm went off, Paul was ready to seize the day. His time trial was not until 10:15, and he was a short ride away from the river, so he had a rare opportunity to sleep in till 7 am on a Saturday. It got even better when he checked his phone and saw that it was a high of 71 degrees.

Rich was already down at the river to help prepare the earlier boats. Paul showered and got ready to meet his mom for breakfast in the hotel. Heather usually went early to voluntarily set up, but she had told her husband she did not want to help out the other parents this morning. He understood.

When Paul arrived in the hotel restaurant for the buffet breakfast, he had trouble finding his mom. If it were not for her wavy, auburn-red hair, he would have never guessed it was her.

"Oh, there you are," Heather waved.

"Hi," Paul replied. He was taken aback by her wearing a soft-yellow v-neck top with her jeans. He could not believe she was wearing it. He could not remember the last time he saw her wearing a shirt like this.

Heather could see that her son's gears were turning. She found it funny considering that it was a fairly normal shirt for a woman to wear. In fact, there were two other mothers in the restaurant wearing similar styles, though her chest was ampler. The v-neck showed a small amount of cleavage, not plunging. It was a simple, cotton tee. But Paul was having trouble keeping his eyes away.

After they filled their plates and sat down, Paul was not speaking as much as he was shoveling food into his mouth and making poor attempts to sneak glances at the form-fitted shirt.

Learning to be less passive and more communicative, the mother spoke lowly, "You were right when you said it was ridiculous that I changed my way of dressing out of fear. So, I decided to go back to wearing what I like to wear. I know wearing baggier clothes isn't gonna change anything. You need to hide your staring better, okay?"

Paul looked at his mom's face, "Ok. I promise I'll try my best." He made sure his eyes moved down to his food instead of the small bit of exposed cleavage.

"So, how are you feelin' about your time trial?"

"I feel good. I'm well-rested. I'm obviously nervous, but that's normal."

"Good to hear it."

 Ch. 19

The Uber ride over to the river was a short one. It felt odd going to a race without being bundled in warm clothes. All Paul had with him was his gym bag with a t-shirt and shorts over his unisuit. All Heather had was a purse over her shoulder.

The mother and son did not talk much on the ride over. When they approached the park where all the teams had set up camp, they encountered a set of speed bumps. With each one, Heather could feel her butt bounce against the car seat, her breasts jiggle, and her hair waving. She did not turn to catch her son looking. He was sitting right next to her when it happened, and it would have been weird if any straight male in his position did not look.

It was just after 8 am when they climbed out of the car. Paul had to be in the water in two hours, and he was about to go warm up. Standing on the grass, Heather mothered her son, "Do you have your water bottle?"

"Yep."

"Do you have your spare socks?"

"Yep."

"Do you have food in case you get hungry?"

"Mom, I just ate a massive breakfast," Paul laughed. But, he saw her giving him that look, so he knew to just open his bag. He watched his mom drop a homemade sandwich inside.

"You know I have to," she smiled. "Good luck. I'll be watching."

"Thanks." Paul walked up the river, and his mother walked down. He noted how his mom seemed to be freer. He felt guilty that he had made her feel uncomfortable for months.

As Heather found the team canopy, she was not surprised to be greeted by stares.

"Ah, there you are. We didn't see you here and imagined you might be wandering around the team canopies," Gretchen stated.

Thinking back to the approach she had planned over the last couple of days, Heather smiled back and replied, "Of course, I was. Some actually have space heaters that are much nicer than ours. This guy a few plots down said that he'd text me to let me know where we can get the same one."

Many parents in the area, mainly the men stared at Heather in hopes she would reveal more interesting information about her time with the mysterious man from the other tent. Alas, Heather just calmly stood in silence. Gretchen opened her mouth to speak, but there was no biting question she could ask that did not seem too obvious, so she simply said, "Oh, cool."

 Ch. 20

As Heather stood near the water and watched some of the earlier time trials, she heard the alarm go off in her pocket. It was 9:15, and her son would be racing in an hour. Heather silenced the alarm and opened her iMessage app. After hovering her thumbs over the keyboard and thinking, Heather typed out a message and sent it to her son.

"Hey, have you eaten the sandwich yet?"

A couple of minutes later, Paul replied, "No. I'm not hungry now. Maybe after."

"Trust me. Go eat the sandwich I made you."

Over near the boat trailers, Paul was confused about why his mom wanted him to eat the sandwich so badly. He went over to his bag and tore off the plastic wrap of the sandwich. When he went to inspect what filler was between the two pieces of white bread, he was surprised to see a ziplock bag. The high-schooler lifted up a slice of bread to see a little bottle of clear liquid and bunched purple fabric.

Turning away from any other people, Paul opened the baggie and the smell coming in through his nostrils told him it was exactly what his heart had hoped it was. The son's heart raced from the fact that his mom had packed him her used thong and a bottle of lube. On the bottom slice of bread, there was a note. It read, "Paul, I know you've been having trouble 'satisfying yourself' before races. I know you're going to use my underwear anyway, so it's best you don't have to risk sneaking things out of the hamper. Here's my thong from yesterday and some lube. This should help you avoid another awkward situation. -Mom"

Paul's hands were trembling and he nearly dropped the bread. He had been horny since this morning, but his erection was now here to stay. In a reply to his mom, Paul messaged, "Thank you!"

Heather was pleased with her work. She had a feeling that Paul was likely so excited that he would have no issue cumming before the race. It also calmed her nerves.

It was approaching 9:30, and Heather had not gotten another message from her son. She had anticipated a text saying it worked or another thank-you text. Checking up, Heather texted Paul, "How did it work out?"

"It's going well. I'm really close."

Heather was glad that it was going well, but he must have waited a while to start. "Oh, good."

"I don't want to keep asking you for favors, but my shirt is hanging off the boat trailer. Can you give it to me?"

"I guess. Where are you? And why do you need your shirt?"

"I'm at the end of the parking lot behind a white trailer that has a logo on it. And I want it just in case I don't finish in time so I can cover up."

That last text raised more questions than answers. Figuring it was best to talk in person, Heather briskly walked to the team's boat trailer. She saw her husband nearby, but she simply grabbed her son's t-shirt and turned to the parking lot. In the back of the lot, there was a white trailer resting on the ground.

Not knowing what she could be walking into, Heather knocked on the metal paneling before rounding the corner. "Paul?"

"Oh, hey, Mom. You can walk back here."

It was clear why he chose the location. Literally nobody could see him. "Was the bathroom full?"

"No," he chuckled, "the lube would have made it too loud and obvious."

Heather noticed his arms covering his crotch over his shorts. In one hand, she saw her thong balled up. Even though she had given it to him, it was a bizarre feeling to see him holding it. "I can see that. Why did you need the shirt?"

"Just in case I don't make it, you know. It's extra protection. And I can always throw it off at the dock without caring if I lose it."

"Well that's what I don't understand," Heather interrogated, "you started at least 20 minutes ago and you still have, let's see, 20 minutes until you have to be in the water. That's more than enough time, especially since you said you were close."

"I am close," Paul explained. "I just don't know how long it will take."

"Has, like, anything come out yet?"

"Well, not yet. But I th-"

"Dammit, Paul! You know you have precum. You know you're not close. Why didn't you just say that?"

With some guilt, Paul answered, "I didn't want you to think the gift was for nothing. And I didn't want to tell you it didn't work so you wouldn't think I was trying to ask for help again."

Heather was a little upset that her clever gift proved fruitless. But Heather knew it was not her son's fault. "So, the thong didn't do anything?"

"No, it did. It made it go up. I really like it, I just can't seem to make it work, even with the lube."

The mother thought about her son's inability to get off using her underwear. "Paul, let me ask you something. Since last Saturday, have you ejaculated at all?"

His face winced. "Uh, no."

"And you've been trying with my underwear?"

"Yeah."

Heather rolled her eyes and threw her arms in the air. "Then obviously there was no chance of it magically working now. I wish you had said something when you saw the note. I don't care if you ask for help. I can always say no, but as long as you legitimately need it, I'm not gonna be mad you asked for it. If it's the difference between you going into the race ready to go, or with a painful erection, you should tell me and let me make the call." She appreciated her son's consideration of her, but he should know she cared about his future.

"Oh... I understand. Well, to be honest, the thong is awesome but it's not making me cum. I- I legitimately need help."

"Yeah, I kind of figured that one out on my own," Heather crossed her arms.

"So," Paul asked sheepishly, "are you going to help me?"

Heather sighed. "I guess I'm already here, aren't I? Has the lube made it easier on you?"

Paul started to buzz. "Kind of. I had to stop using it because it was staining my uniform."

Heather could see spots above her son's waistline. "Well, yeah. You're going to ruin it. There are going to be impressions of your dick in your uniform. Have you just been reaching inside with the lube and thong?" Her son nodded. Heather smacked her hand to her face. Sometimes Paul could be so wise, and other times he was an idiot. "Sweety, lube is to help it go faster. You have to take it out for lube."

Paul was embarrassed, but he was more focused on the implications of what his mom said. "So, you want me to take it out? And just stand here in front of you like that?"

If it had been last Saturday, Heather would have been frightened. But now, after she had seen him erect under his clothes, talked to him about it at length, and given him her used thong, she was more willing to accept the uncomfortable reality. "Yes. If I'm going to uncomfortably show skin to make it work, then you have to be willing, too."

Heather turned around so that her son could remove his unisuit and put on his t-shirt and shorts. "Alright. Now lube it up, but just on the shaft."

Paul took the lube from his pocket and squirted it in his hand. Heather then watched as he tugged his shorts down, springing his erect cock. It was human nature for Heather to look. And her son was sporting a solid 7 inches. She had seen his penis plenty of times, but not in the form of an adult man's. It was an interesting feeling to be looking at it again. Before she knew it, her son was lathering the white shaft in lubricant.

"Ok, now what?"

The mother's gaze broke, and she answered, "Well, now you can stroke it with your hand, or the thong if you want." Heather watched as her son used her purple thong to stroke himself in front of her. She then reminded herself that she was there as a muse for his fantasies.

Spinning her head around, Heather was actually sure this time that there was no way somebody could see them. Remembering the lesson she had learned from last time when it took too long, Heather got to the point and grabbed the bottom of her yellow shirt. She rolled it up under her breasts and made sure her son was looking. His eyes were wide in anticipation.

Heather used her shirt to lift her bra up a bit before pulling the yellow fabric over her chest and head in one motion. She stood in front of her son naked from the waist up, with the exception of a white bra.

"Oh my god," he breathed, watching her breasts move. He enjoyed the curves and smoothness of her stomach. He loved the way her green eyes, red hair, and white bra created a beautiful palette.

After running her hands up her sides and over her breasts, Heather explained, "We have about ten minutes before you have to get your uniform on again and get ready to launch. I'm not going to waste time with things that aren't gonna get you there."

Heather turned in place. Her son loved how her butt cheeks looked in her jeans. "Is that another thong?"

Glancing down, Heather saw that a blue string was arising from her waistband. "It is, actually." She could tell it garnered her son's attention. And she could see what the purple one he had was doing for him. So, Heather hooked her thumbs beneath her waistband and lifted up to reveal the blue straps. She let the straps rest high on her hips.

"Uuuhh," Paul grunted. There was enchantment in his eyes.

It was a simple move that revealed no part of her body, and it was having a large effect. Heather ran with it. The mother got on her toes and played with her hair while bouncing her breasts. She then placed her thumbs back under the blue straps and tugged at them.

Paul was masturbating much harder than before, in a brutish way.

"You know," Heather advised, "using it like a bike pump is not going to help you. You need to massage it more."

Paul slowed down a bit. He more rhythmically stroked it forward and back. "I really like your thong. The blue looks nice on your skin," he complimented.

Heather laughed, "I can tell you like it." She played with it again. "Well, now that I think about it, I'm sure you'll get your hands on it at some point soon."

"I definitely want it."

Heather shook her head in disbelief. "I would have never guessed me tugging on thong straps would make you so interested."

Paul smiled. "I'm interested in everything you do."

The mother's cheeks warmed, and she scoffed because it was obvious he was not trying to flirt when he said that.

Paul moaned again. He really wanted to cum, but he could not yet.

"You can't stroke it like that," Heather informed him. "You're gripping so hard because you don't know how to stimulate it. I honestly think that's why you have trouble masturbating. Give it a deep massage. Try fondling your testicles with one hand. And use the other to stroke it, and try using your thumb to massage right under the head."

Willing to listen to any advice his mom gave, Paul grabbed his testicles with one hand while awkwardly wrapping the other hand around his shaft. Heather watched him manipulate his hand positioning on his dick. When Paul tried to fondle his balls, he let out a shout of agony. When he tried to massage the underside of his shaft, he was unable to stroke.

"Where do guys learn how to masturbate?" Heather shook her head. "It's like how a Barbarian would do it." For nearly two minutes, Heather watched as her son tried and failed to use his hands correctly.

"I think squeezing hard does work," Paul defended.

"If it did I wouldn't be here," the mother huffed. "We're getting short on time," a flabbergasted Heather ordered, "toss me the thong."

Paul gripped the lube-soaked thong in his fingers and gently held it out. Heather stepped up, grabbed it, and then reached down to cup her son's testicles with it. Paul gasped loudly. Heather lightly squeezed and rolled her son's balls in her hand through the thong. "This is how it should feel. Now use your other two hands- one to stroke, and the other to massage under the tip."

The fact that he could feel his mother's hand pleasuring his testicles was amazing. Her face and body being positioned right in front of his was an additional benefit. Paul did not know how he got so lucky.

Heather was close enough where she felt her son's deep warm breaths hit the surface of her tits. Her main priority, though, was making sure he got out to the race on time and in winning condition.

"That feels incredible."

"It should feel that way. You need to be able to do this to yourself."

"Uh-huh. I don't think I could do it as well as you. Uhhh-uh."

The mother looked down again to see her son's progress. He was trying his best, but he was not going to get there fast enough. And it was obvious he could not do anything as well as her.

"You know what," Heather sighed, "you have about five minutes, and I can't teach you how to actually masturbate in that amount of time." The flustered mother pulled her son's hands off. Before she could talk herself out of it, Heather placed her hand right onto her son's shaft.

Paul instantly jolted. A big drop of precum spewed out and dripped down onto Heather's wrist. Heather instinctively pulled her arm away and shuddered. Paul thought he had just ruined his chance. But, before he could say anything, his mom's hands were back on him.

Of all the bold things Heather had done in her life, this took the cake. She could feel her son's penis beating in her hands. She began to stroke it with her palm and used her thumb to circulate around the sensitive area of his head.

"Oh shit. Oh shit. Oh shit," Paul moaned. The feeling of his mom's hands was indescribable. "This is so hot. You have no idea." (Heather did).

Heather could feel a river of precum starting to flow. Her son was getting close. She looked down at her hands, and she had strings of his liquid running through her fingers and landing on her forearms. "I can make it hotter for you if you need it," Heather offered. She had remembered what helped him finish last time.

Paul nodded profusely.

Heather lowered herself into a squatting position.

Paul had an overhead view of her breasts and could see her buttcheeks stretching the material of her jeans. He moaned loudly from seeing her look up at him with her green eyes. "You look so hot right now, oh my god. You're amazing at this."

The mother blushed. With a chortle, she replied, "I know, I've done this before." She rocked on her feet to make her chest move vigorously. Heather took her hand off of his testicles and handed him the purple thong. "Hold it tightly over your head. Cum into it."

"Ok," Paul agreed.

Heather cradled Paul's balls with her bare hand. She smelled the odorous lubricant and precum as she felt it running down from his shaft and dripping onto her hands and wrists. She had to assume the thong covering his tip was going to hold firm since his cockhead was aiming directly at her.

"I'm about to cum. I'm about to cum. I'm about to cum," Paul sputtered as his eyelids squinted.

"I can tell." The experienced mom increased her stroke speed and her grip on her son's balls. She looked up at her son and informed, "I'm ready when you are, Paul."

Only two more pumps were needed before Paul grunted loudly. "Uuugh! Aaahhh! Uuhhh!" The son's vision blurred as his testicles pumped semen up and out of his dick.

A week's worth of ejaculate fired into the soaked thong that was balled up and held tightly against Paul's pink tip. Heather's eyes were wide as she continued to squeeze and stroke her way through her son's orgasm. She could feel his ejaculate traveling from his balls through his urethra.

Heather wondered how the lube-covered thong would hold the large load. That question was immediately answered as Paul's cum started to be forced out from the bottom of the bunched lingerie. It poured like molasses down onto Heather's forearm. Her instinct was to pull her arm away. But since her son was still pent up, and her hands and arms were already glistening with juices, Heather simply winced and allowed the stringy jizz to drizzle onto her arm.

When the last of the ooze-laden pumps subsided, Heather let go. The mom and son were both breathing heavily- Heather, from the hard work that she generously put in, and Paul, from the oxygen-restricting orgasm that had clenched all of his muscles for nearly a minute.

When they both were able to stand up straight again, they looked at each other in shock over what they had both done. Likely because this was her second time and not as much of a surprise, Heather did not run away in fear. Instead, Heather stood there and saw the proof that her son's body was now flaccid and relaxed.

Heather noticed her son was examining her arms. She could see why. "Wow," she commented, "you did not make a big enough pocket with that thong."

With his mom's dry sense of humor, Paul was sometimes not sure if he was being lectured or if his mom was telling a joke. So, he remained silent.

There were not exactly set social standards for what to say in a moment like this, so neither of them spoke. The silence was dragging. Finally, Heather announced, "You need to get to your boat."

The relaxed son nodded. He turned around and used his t-shirt to wipe himself off. He then put on his uniform, placed the cum-filled thong and the lube back into the plastic bag, and then hid the bag in his shorts. It was hard to look at his half-naked mother and know what to say. He noticed she was still not cleaned up. He handed his shirt-turned-clean-up-rag to her and spoke, "Um, uh, yeah... Here you go." He quickly jogged away to get to the boat trailer.

Her mind was, thankfully, too numb to start thinking clearly. Heather cleaned up, got herself dressed, and over to watch her son's race.

 Ch. 21

This race was different than the ones from last weekend. In fact, it was much different. Paul was a beast in the boat. In his blue and white unisuit and medium-length brown hair, Heather watched her son's image grow larger and larger into her binoculars. And, more importantly, he was moving down the river at the fastest rate of any rower so far.

Sure, it was true that many of the best rowers held back in time trials in order to preserve their energy for the following day, but Paul was still rowing the clip of his life. After he had passed his team canopy on the river bank, he crossed the finish line in a position that would undoubtedly make him the top seed in his heat.

It was rewarding for Heather to see her son row so well. She was mostly happy for him for how thrilled he had to be feeling. But she was also happy for herself that her risky 'help' had paid off. And, she was also happy to see that Gretchen and Mary were silently stewing. The only annoyance was that Eric did smirk in Heather's direction, having an idea of why her son was so motivated again.

When Paul finally made his way to the team canopy so that he could stuff his face with as many calories as possible, the mom and son caught each other's glance. They were both unsure of how to look at the other or how to react, but it was not as awkward as last weekend.

As usual, Heather and Paul stepped toward each other.

"You did so well! Congratulations!" Heather's voice was cheerful but reserved.

"Thanks, mom," Paul smiled.

It only took a moment for Heather to feel how her lending a hand in her son's new pregame ritual had made a lasting impact. "Nobody saw it when you got out of the water?" the mom whispered in her son's ear.

"I held a water bottle in front until I got back to my shorts," he mumbled back before leaving the hug.

------Part Four------

 Ch. 22

The best part of staying close to the river and deciding not to help out the other parents anymore was that Heather got to return to the hotel in the afternoon. She could actually relax and watch tv on a Saturday. Paul just wanted to feel his soft hotel mattress under his exhausted back and legs.

The Uber ride back to the hotel was certainly more uncomfortable than the one there. It was silent to the point where the driver quipped, "Man, you guys must be wiped out," right before dropping them off at the hotel.

Subconsciously trying to avoid an awkward elevator ride, Heather decided to go to the bathroom in the lobby while Paul went to his room.

"Hell yes," Heather breathed, feeling her pajama-covered legs plop onto the queen mattress. She sipped her tea from a mug and watched a random tv movie. She did not care what it was. It let her mind focus on something easy to follow. Still, her mind kept recalling what she had done with Paul. It seemed that every commercial break or any time the plot moved slowly she would think to how she teased him with her thong, and if she needed to step in to use her hands, and how she told him she could make it hotter. She thought about how weird it was to hold his dick and the feeling of his jizz getting all over her hands.

Of course, any time she began to question her actions, Heather assured herself it was necessary for her son's future and ability to get a scholarship to a school that would set him up for life. She encouraged the 'angel on her shoulder' to challenge her logic. Sure, everything she had done with her son felt wrong, but all of her actions were easily justifiable.

 Ch. 23

One mediocre tv movie ended and led to another. Heather lay on her bed eating mini pretzels, trying to stop her mind from wandering. Upstairs, Paul, up from a well-earned nap and still feeling anxiety and guilt, was about to make that harder.

Heather nearly jolted from the sound of her phone buzzing. It had been quiet in her room with no interruptions until now. She checked her phone and saw the message was from her son. She abruptly sat up against her headboard to read the message.

"Hey mom. I just wanted to message you because I don't think I said thank you for helping me before the race. I feel bad about it and don't want you to think I took it for granted or anything. I know it was a big deal for you to do that. I couldn't have rowed that well without you. So thank you."

After reading the message a few times, Heather considered how to respond to a message like that. "You're welcome :) It means a lot that you said that. I know I was mean that one time, but I never thought you took it for granted. I knew you appreciated it today and that you were just a little nervous. The gift didn't work and we are both surprised by it happening. It's ok. And it is a big deal but you made it worth it with that great row!"

Floors above, Paul felt some peace that his mom did not think he was ungrateful. He was also glad that his mom was not feeling regret. "Again, I'm really sorry that your gift didn't work. The surprise was really cool. I loved the thong and it was really helpful but I guess I couldn't get my mind to the right place. I wanted it to work too." The son quickly followed up with a procedural question, "And what do you want me to do with it? I have it in the bag still."

Heather had been sitting up in her bed, wondering if her son would respond to her last message. The redheaded mother did not want her son to feel bad about her gift not going according to plan. "It's okay. I knew it might not work when I made it. The thong and the lube ended up helping a lot anyway so no biggie. And just hold onto it until I can get home and run it through the wash a bunch of times lol. And it's good you loved it but from how you reacted when I helped you, I think I got you the wrong color lol." Heather was happy with the message she sent. It was light enough to ease his conscience and made things seem less serious.

Paul was quick. "Haha. And ok I'll leave it in the bag. And I did like the purple a lot, I promise. I think it was just because the blue one was on you that I wanted to see that one more. I don't think it would've made a difference. And I couldn't tell how mad you were when I left, but I'm really sorry about not holding the purple one tight enough to catch it all :/ I didn't know the cum would leak out. I saw you make that reaction when it hit you and when the precum hit your hand earlier. I could tell you wanted to stop the handjob but thank you for going anyway. I really appreciate it."

Heather read the long message three times and lifted her knees in front of her. It was funny that she had never used the term 'handjob' in her own mind when thinking about her 'help', but it was true that that's what it was. "I was only teasing about the thong color... You're right. I'm pretty sure beige would have been more interesting if that was one the I had on lol. And I wasn't actually mad about the cum thing. I was just surprised by how it all happened. If I wanted to stop, I would have." The mother laughed to herself and then swiftly typed, "Plus, it's a handjob... you kind of have to go into it thinking that that might happen to your hands haha. It was only my arms and hands. And you left me your shirt too to clean up, so thank you for that!"

"You're welcome :) I didn't know if you had tissues lol. I was about to walk away with it too but then I remembered you couldn't use your shirt to clean up." It seemed that Paul finally realized he did not need to feel guilty about anything that happened today.

"No haha. I still needed to wear it! I was concerned beforehand about it getting a grass stain on the ground. With those parents, I can't imagine walking back to camp if it had white spots on it :O You did kind of save me there."

"I actually still can't believe you took it all the way off. Especially right away :O I know I saw most of your upper body last Saturday, but it was so amazing today! I have to admit, getting to look over them, like when they bounced when you were even lower lol... I'm really happy you did that for me. It was what helped me finish so fast :)"

Heather rolled onto her stomach and propped herself up with her elbows at the front end of the bed. "'My favorite part was when you got down low and I could see your boobs'... typical guy," Heather smirked as she added an eye-rolling emoji. "And I learned from last time that seeing them helped you finish faster, and I know you liked to be surprised lol. What surprised me was how into my blue thong you were even though my boobs were right there too. Why was that? Before I put my hands on you, the thong made you ooze out the most."

"You were checking to see how much precum was coming out? And I liked the bands when you hooked your thumbs under them. I guess it was the teasing that I liked." Paul was surprised he was able to message his mom about their sexy experience for this long.

"I figured it was the teasing ;) Though I guess if you're going to wear a thong it's nice for it to get attention (and not just after it's in the hamper lol)." Heather was now up and pacing in her hotel room. "And of course I was watching... It gives me important info. Like what I'm doing that's working, how close you are, if you actually know how to masturbate, etc."

"I'm glad I saw that blue strap that was poking out then haha ;) It's weird but it's only the times I was with you I've had a ton of precum like that. So I thought something could be gross or wrong with having it. It's good it was helpful though! And if I knew you wanted more feedback I would've said more helpful things about how well things were working ;) I think you did everything I would have asked for to help me finish faster anyway."

Heather's cheeks were red. "There is nothing 'wrong' with it just because it's happened when you thought of me. It just meant your load was built up and your balls wouldn't release cum until your dick was given what it wanted lol. And it was not 'gross' at all! I took it as a compliment. Plus, handjobs can be boring for women. So some women prefer a sticky mess ;)" She turned the air conditioner lower in her room. "And I liked the feedback you gave me. You could have given me more detailed feedback ;) ... but the cock doesn't lie."

Paul was now also pacing in his room. Luckily, his roommate was still out at the river. "Are you one of those women that likes handjobs to be a 'sticky mess'? And how well does watching a dick work? Were you able to notice by how my dick reacted that I liked your butt when you turned around?"

Reading the text and stepping into the bathroom, Heather, with pride, studied the way her butt looked in the mirror. "Firstly, I let you coat my hands and wrists until they were sticking to everything lol. And THEN I stayed there and kept jerking you off until you were empty. I could've left once you shot once. I knew it was going to be a massive load and I STILL stayed even while you fucking came on my arm! Obviously it doesn't bother me haha." Heather smirked at her clever response. "And I actually did not notice you liked my butt... maybe because I was turned around. Did you plan on saying something and chose not to?"

Heather watched the animated iMessage dots on her screen, waiting for a response. Any time they stopped, she looked at her phone with confusion. Upstairs, Paul had been doing the same. "I guess that's true. To be honest, it was really hot how you kept going no matter what. I didn't know you actually preferred it! You should have told me... I would've held your thong looser ;) lol. And obviously I had thoughts but it was so crazy that you were already showing me your boobs and thong. I didn't want to make it seem like they weren't enough to focus on. I wanted to say how good your butt looked in tighter jeans. I almost forgot what it looked like haha."

Alone in her room, Heather felt excited to see another message arrive. She rolled her eyes and laughed at her son's joke. "Lol. You're lucky I let you get away with that much cum on me. I had every right to pull away. Maybe it's my fault for not knowing that lubed thong couldn't handle a week's worth of jizz. If I knew I was going to give you a handjob I would have let you try my bra from yesterday in a hoagie lol. And thank you :) I've been hiding my butt well then. And you check me out in family photos... you know what my butt looks like, with a lot of skin too."

"Who says I've never used your bras ;) And what photo would have shown me that?"

"I guess I wouldn't know lol. And I think there are photos of me in my turquoise bikini from Maine. At least one of them might show it from behind."

"I know that gallery from when you had that bikini. I've used it before. And the photos are only from the front. Plus, I think that bottom didn't reveal much skin from what I remember."

"First of all, you say 'had that bikini' as if I don't still have it. Secondly, that thing certainly does show off a lot of skin. It's not a thong bottom but probably half my butt is out."

"You're just trolling me lol. You haven't worn that in years. That was even before you tried dressing differently."

"Paul... when is the last time you would've seen me swimming in the last couple of years? And I've also been hiding clothes from you and just recently brought some of them back. Which bikini do you think I brought to this hotel?"

"You're lying..."

A radiant joy appeared on Heather's smooth face. She knew she could blow her son's mind. Heather was practically bouncing on her toes as she dug into her suitcase. She laid the turquoise bikini on her bed. It's mature color complimented her eyes, hair, and warm skin perfectly. The mother took a picture of it and sent it to her son.

"We should go swimming in the pool," he responded in seconds. Upstairs, Paul's adrenaline was surging.

"Haha. You don't want to go swimming. You just want to see me in this bikini ;)"

"Obviously ;) But we can do both haha."

Heather was interested but hesitant. "Bad idea. If there are other people there, your staring will look weird. And it's going to be dinner time soon."

"I PROMISE I will not stare the whole time. Come on... it'll be fun! What are you doing right now other than just sitting in your room?"

The energized mom thought things through. "Fine... But you need to wear Under Armour under your trunks. And if I think your staring is too obvious, we're leaving. Okay?"

"Deal!"

Paul rifled through his suitcase for his trunks and spandex boxers like it was an FBI raid. Heather, too, was hurrying to change into her suit. Paul ran a comb through his hair and chose between different tank tops to wear with his red trunks. Heather saw how she looked in the bikini and decided to put her auburn-red hair into a ponytail.

After turning in the mirror to see how much of her butt the bikini was really showing, Heather contemplated sending a mirror selfie to her son. It probably wouldn't be good if the first time he sees it is public. Heather took the photo but thought better of sending it. What if a friend gets his phone or it gets hacked?

"I'm heading to the pool now," Paul texted.

"Me too :)"

 Ch. 24

Heather arrived outside of the pool entrance just before Paul. When the excited son arrived, he and his mom exchanged wide smiles. He then examined her wardrobe to see she was in her yellow shirt, jean shorts, and flip flops.

There was a lot more vulnerability in trying to flirt with his mom in person than over text message. Paul was unsure of what he could say. "Is, uh- Are you actually wearing it?"

The mother pushed the bottom of her shirt in, hooked her thumb under her denim waistband, and tugged lightly on turquoise fabric. She revealed half an inch of the strap. "It looks like it. Are you wearing your Under Armour underneath?"

Paul did the same thing his mom had done, and he revealed a small amount of the black elastic band of his boxers. "Looks like it." The mother and son laughed.

"Ok, before we go in, remember not to stare. And I'm only going to show you the top at first. I'm just gonna read in a lounge chair. If you do well with that, then I'll take my shorts off and get into the pool with you."

The thought of his mom floating in the water in front of him wearing nothing but a small bikini made it even harder for Paul to prevent an erection.

The hotel pool was on the second-highest floor of the hotel and had large windows that overlooked the city surrounding it. When they entered the pool area, they could see they were not alone. Paul had been dreaming they would be. Instead, there was a family in the shallow end, some dude working on a Macbook, and two 'sunbathers' lounging in the reclining chairs.

The mother and son took off their flip flops by chairs in the corner. Paul took his tank off and went into the pool. Heather scanned the room to see if anyone was looking. There was an obvious age gap between her son and her, but, by how her son looked with his shirt off, she was concerned people might think she was some cougar with her date.

She was wearing a revealing bikini that she had bought to wear for Rich on vacation years ago. It was not the current style, but it was the only swimwear Heather had that fit into her new desire to dress how she wanted. Worried that once she removed her clothes it would look as if she were a married woman on a hotel rendezvous with a younger man, Heather took the two rings off of her finger and put them in her bag.

In the water, Paul was wading and acting relaxed. Heather noticed him moving his eyes in a way that just happened to linger on her every few seconds. It was not perfect, but passable. And the mom found it humorous. She removed her yellow shirt.

Paul's eyes went from lingering to fixed in a moment's notice. The turquoise top made the color in his mom's almond-shaped eyes pop. The elegant folds in the fabric of the molded triangle top gave Heather a more sophisticated sexiness, and Paul was all for it.

Seeing her son's reaction, Heather raised her eyebrow, reminding him she could pull the plug on their late-afternoon swim at any moment. His face flushed red from being caught, and he went back to sneaking peeks.

 Ch. 25

For over fifteen minutes, Heather just lounged in her chair and read a novel on her phone. She had not taken her jean shorts off yet and was enjoying the humor in her son's increasing anticipation that she soon would. It's not like he's gonna leave.

Finally, Heather decided that she had waited long enough to cool off in the pool and that her son had been tortured long enough by waiting. She stood up and slid her shorts down her toned legs. Her son's reaction made her beam with pride.

It may have looked like any other bikini bottom from the front, but it was still more than Paul had seen of his mom in months. He went from floating in the water to gripping the edge of the pool quickly. He was not the only one who had his head up. Everyone, except for the children in the shallow end, had turned their heads to the woman standing up in the sexy swimwear.

With a hint of cockiness, Heather swiped her ponytail off of her shoulder. She strutted over to the pool ladder and turned around to climb in.

Paul wanted to melt. His mom's booty had more girth than most, and the statement that this bikini revealed at least half of it was no lie. But, Heather was soon in the water and the perfect view ended. If it were not a small pool area with other people, the mother would have told her son to close his mouth so he would not drool. Instead, a flattered Heather sighed and shook her head condescendingly.

It was dreamlike for Paul to be just two feet away from his mom in this situation. But now, he had no clue what to do. Maybe he never imagined he would get this far. With other people around, he had to be careful with his speech. "It's pretty nice in here."

"Yeah, it's refreshing after being outside all day."

"Are you glad you decided to go swimming?"

Heather shrugged nonchalantly. "It got me out of my room." Her lingering smile made her statement less cold.

There was more silence. "This is helping take the tension out of my muscles."

Heather could not help herself. "I would have thought the massage you got earlier today would've already done that?"

Paul's body kicked in the water. "It did. It did. It definitely did," he assured. "I meant they're just sore from rowing."

Heather did not respond, as she just continued to snicker at her own joke. "Well, I'm gonna hop out now."

"Wait, that's it?"

"Yeah," the mother motioned to the windows looking out to the city, "like you, I mainly came here for the view." She then flicked her eyes down towards the water. "Uh, you should stay in a little longer."

Paul watched as his mother swam away to the ladder. He watched her slowly climb out and the droplets of water run down her wet body. He then noticed why his mom wanted him to stay in. He could feel his erection was growing sideways over his thigh instead of straight up in his compression shorts. He lifted himself out of the pool and headed to the bathroom to adjust himself.

 Ch. 26

When the son emerged from the bathroom, he looked to the corner of the concrete floor to see his mom lying on her towel. She was now having a conversation, however, with the man that had been working on his Macbook.

"I figured you were a crew parent. Your son looked like a rower and then I overheard him talking about him rowing earlier today," Paul heard the man speak.

"So, you were eavesdropping?" Heather challenged.

"Small pool," the man laughed back. "Anyway, I don't know if you heard of it, but I'm part of a network of crew parents from all these different schools that help each other out at races."

"Oh, really?"

"Yeah. It's really nice because I'm sure you've experienced this, where you realize your team forgot ice for your drink cooler or coffee or... whatever ha-ha. So, now, parents can either walk over to their neighboring team's canopies or even shoot a text and get help from parents on other teams."

"Oh, that sounds nice."

"Exactly. Just because our kids are competing doesn't mean we all can't get along. And it's also nice to meet other people at races besides just for the small group of parents on your own team."

"Oohhh... I get that ha-ha."

"Where are you guys located?"

"Pennsylvania, outside Philly."

"Oh, ok. We're from Washington state, so we probably never race each other haha."

"Oh, is this only for teams out west?" Heather asked, disappointed.

"No, no. Well, yes, actually ha-ha. But we keep wanting to get more people from all over the country."

"Sounds like Nationals is the place then."

"Our thought exactly. If your team is interested, we'd love for you to join the group."

"I don't know if everyone will be, but I can try," Heather shrugged optimistically.

"Oh cool! It would be great to have you."

"How do we join?"

"It's really simple. You could just talk to your team and let me know if they want in. I actually have some lit that we made. If you want me to, I can even stop by your team canopy and talk about it with them tomorrow."

"Huh, that would actually be great. Do you guys have cards?"

"All of our contact info is on the flyer we made. Here," the man reached into his wallet, "this is my card. Let me know if you want the flyer."

"Oh, thank you. I don't have a card on me at the pool," Heather chuckled.

"That's fine. You can just text me your name and I'll send you the info. Oh, yeah, I'm Quinn, by the way."

"Heather. And I'll do that. Just send it whenever because I'd like to look at it first."

Paul watched as his mom finished her conversation with the stranger. Even though he had overheard most of the conversation, after the guy exited the pool area, Paul walked over to his mom and asked, "So, what was that all about?"

"He's part of some club for crew parents, and he'd like us to join."

The son reclined in the chair next to his mom and suggested, "I don't know if that was why he came over to you."

Heather laughed. "Ehhh, probably not. But, this still seems like a good program." Seeing as they were now isolated in the corner of the pool and nobody else could easily overhear them, Heather teased, "You're not jealous, are you? Just because you invited me to the pool to check out my bikini doesn't mean I can't talk to other guys. I mean, if he did do it just to try to pick me up, he only did it because you left for a bit."

"Ha-ha," Paul replied, sarcastically. "And no, I honestly don't care. I'm not surprised he did that. And, to my defense, I only went to the bathroom because I was fixing the issue you pointed out."

"Like, fixed fixed?"

"No, like adjusted fixed."

The attractive mother chortled. "I knew you wouldn't be able to keep it together. That's why I told you to wear the boxers."

"Hey! I was doing really well for a while. Like it was only a little stiff."

"And may I ask what did you in?"

"It was, uh, when you climbed out. It was just surprising that it actually looked like that on you."

"I figured. That ladder had a lot of steps," Heather admitted. "And I actually was about to send you a pic of me in it before we got here so you wouldn't have that 'surprise'."

"Wait, really?" Paul was intrigued. He ran his eyes over his mom's shiny body. "Why didn't you?"

"Uh, you know... concerns over if one of your friends was on your phone or it was hacked or something. I didn't want someone, who doesn't know the uniqueness of the situation, to see that I sent a half-naked selfie to my son."

"Oh, god," Paul softly groaned. "That would have been nice to see beforehand. I would have rather you not told me you thought of that and then didn't do it ha-ha. I wish we had been using Viber or Snapchat ha-ha."

"Oh, one of those apps with the messages that disappear?"

"Yeah, those."

Heather thought about it for a moment. "To be honest, we probably should be using those. Like, we've texted about the thong and the handwork and other things that people could misinterpret as being sexual. For someone that doesn't know our situation, they might get the wrong idea."

"I can't even imagine what would happen," the son nodded. "You should sign up for them now. I already have Snapchat, but I'll just download Viber. And then, let's add each other."

The mom and son spent there last minutes at the pool downloading their privacy apps. It would make personal messaging much less risky.

 Ch. 27

Dinner in the hotel restaurant was a family event to a certain extent. Rich, Heather, and Paul all ate together, but Rich was gone in 20 minutes. Nationals was the busiest week of the year for the coaches of an elite rowing program. When there were not races happening, there were strategy meetings and preparation.

Heather and Paul soon found themselves back in their rooms. Paul's teammate was back in his bed, and Heather was back to reading a book on her phone. Only half an hour passed before a notification interrupted her novel. She clicked it, and Snapchat opened. It was a selfie of Paul's smiling face that was captioned, "Hello. Earth to Mom. Testing. Testing."

The mother laughed at a joke that only a mother could find funny. She read a short article online about how to use the basics of the app. She curved her red lips and flashed her straight teeth for her photo. "Message received."

"What are you up to?" Paul sent another smiling selfie.

Heather took a picture of her pajama-covered legs. "I'm just reading in bed. What about you?"

"Jack is back. So watching him play his Switch on the tv."

"Why don't you play with him?"

"Not fun enough. We should go swimming again." His face was riddled with anticipation.

The mother sent a video of her rolling her eyes and smirking. "You just want to see me climb out of the pool again."

"No! I loved that. But I also liked hanging out with you."

"I liked hanging out with you too. But I'm all dry now so I'm not putting wet stuff back on lol."

"Boo!" Paul's face was jokingly disappointed. "Are you just going to stay in all night?"

Heather sat up in her bed. She took a picture of her stomach and higher, showing her black t-shirt and let-down hair. "Excuse me? I went swimming with you already. Where do you plan on going?"

The mother then received a short video of Paul shrugging. "I think there's a sauna in the gym. We could go there."

"I told you, my bikini is wet and it smells like chlorine. So, that's a no go." Heather displayed a fake frowning face.

"I think in saunas you just wear towels usually. Right?"

With a photo of her looking taken aback, Heather replied, "Yeah... fat chance! You'd have a tent in your towel and no way to tuck it under anything."

Paul was loving the way his mom was messaging him. "Well, you could bring the blue thong up so I can use it if that happens lol."

Heather was now sitting on her legs in her bed. Her son seemed to be more self-assured than over text. "Lol. You wish. The whole point of the thong is so you jerk off without me being there. The dirty thong doesn't seem to work for you anymore anyway."

"If it doesn't work and you don't want to see it, you could help me again lol."

Heather brought her hand to her face. Her mouth was open in more of an impressed type of shock that he would be bold enough to suggest that. "That is NOT how this works. I only do what I NEED to do. I don't give you a handjob because you're around me & hard."

"Fair enough," Paul was grinning with warm cheeks. "But you said you liked messy and sticky handjobs. It would be hot and sticky in a sauna."

The mother gave her son the middle finger with a smirk. "So clever. And yeah... it would be a hot sticky mess for me, and then you'd blackout from heatstroke from having no blood flow."

"That might be true lol. I almost blacked out today lol. Today was the best handjob I've ever gotten by a mile. I can't believe I came so hard. Your hands, body & eyes knew what they were doing."

"Thanks," Heather was blushing and buzzing, "I'm glad you feel that way. You were actually good too. I mean, I did all the work ;) But you made it fun by letting me know how bad you wanted it. And I have to say, your dick was pretty lively in every way. It made it much more engaging for me."

"I'm glad my dick was to your liking."

Heather did not respond as quickly as usual. In his bed, Paul was nervous that he had finally went too far. But, minutes later, Heather sent him a Snap of her biting her lip awkwardly. "That dude from the pool just started hitting on me."

"Lol. What did he say?"

"He texted me the flyer & told me to ask him questions I had. I messaged him a few. He asked if I wanted to talk about them in the hotel bar lol."

"What did you say? Lol"

"Nothing yet. What do you think I should say?" There was no doubt about it that Heather was horny. She chose not to recognize it because she did not want to admit it to herself.

"What do you want to do?"

"Well, this is a stranger in a hotel and I'm married..."

"That obviously hasn't stopped you before lol. What do you want to do?" Heather was surprised that her son was not angry or concerned.

"Well, I don't know if I told you but I kind of chose to run with the reputation of being the 'loose' mom. If a parent saw me down there just getting drinks it could help me out haha."

"Dad could also see you..."

"That's true. What's your advice? You gave me good advice last time."

Floors higher, Paul was in the bathroom stroking his cock. He had been touching it for some time. "You should get a drink in his room and suck his dick."

"Woah! What?!" Heather sent a selfie with her jaw dropped and eyebrows bunched.

"You obviously want to see him. You're in the mood to have fun. You want to be the 'loose' mom. So, do it." The way Paul saw it, the more sexualized his mom had become, the better things have gotten for him. More would be better.

"That's crazy! I want to play the slutty mom on the team, not be her. Why are you ok with me doing that?"

"I think if everyone already thinks you're doing it, then you might as well do it. And it would honestly be INSANELY hot. Do it!" Paul quickly send another Snap, "You could stay inside your room in your pajamas or you could have fun :)"

Heather sighed to herself and was now pacing in her room. "What would I even say exactly? I'm not even positive he wants it."

"Yes he does lol. Just say he wouldn't want to be seen at a bar with someone of your 'reputation'. Then when he asks what it is, tell him there's a rumor that you're known for blowing the dads on other teams."

"That is SOOOO transparent lol."

"Exactly. You're in a hotel. You'll never see this guy again after this weekend. You can go for broke on this."

"You're a bad influence," Heather responded, with some truth. She was not able to think outside the immediate decisions she was making with the help of her son.

It was ten minutes later than Heather finally updated her eagerly-awaiting son. "I told him I had a reputation for giving handjobs instead. He asked how I got it. I told him I don't want to talk about it in a crowded bar. I said we should get a drink in his room instead. He just asked me if the rumor is true."

"Oh wow! You did it! What are you going to say?"

With a smug expression, Heather Snapped her son. "I said that if I put my hand on his cock then he'd know it's true. He gave me his room number and said to come over whenever I want lol."

"You're amazing! This is so cool. Update me as much as you can."

"I will!"

It was a few minutes before Heather sent her son another message. It was a random picture of the floor with the captioned question, "Black, red, or white?" Paul figured she was selecting her shirt for her sexy meet up. "Red," he said.

It was a while until Heather sent her son another message. It was worth the wait. Heather was standing in front of her bathroom mirror with mascara and blush on. She had on another pair of shorter shorts and a black blouse that revealed plenty of cleavage. "Do you like it?"

"HELL YES!! You look so hot. I'm so jealous of him!"

"Why are you jealous?" Heather messaged. "He's just going to get a less sexy version of what I gave you?"

"... Unless you blow him!"

"Why would I do that? You won't get to see it or anything. Why's that such a hot idea for you?"

"Honestly, I just want to know that you were willing to blow a guy. I like imagining you're that type of person!"

"Not going to happen. But I can do something that will make me seem hotter right now..."

"Oh yeah? What's that?"

Paul waited until he received a video message from his mom. It was her, with her back turned to the mirror. She was tugging and playing with the straps and back of a red, lace thong. "Good call on the red. It's satin too... which means it's gonna feel so good on your cock tomorrow ;)"

The son lurched forward, but he did not orgasm. It was a close call. "I want you to hold my balls with that like you did with the purple one."

Heather sent a close up of her face. "That can be arranged ;) Now, I have to go jerk some guy off. Talk later." With steamy heat radiating from her pores, Heather left her room.

Paul soon learned the downside to his advice. He found himself waiting for close to an hour in his hotel bathroom. His teammate had to ask him if he was okay. He began to question if his mom had just been toying with him and was actually asleep. But he never fully gave up hope or lost his erection. It was worth the wait.

Paul's eyes shot open and his heart raced when he saw he had a new message from his mom. It was just a picture of a bathroom countertop that asked, "Are you alone in your room?"

"I'm alone in my bathroom. Why?"

Moments later, a video from his mom arrived. Paul's head was on the verge of exploding. It was his mom showing her graceful lips and deep eyes. But there was a hint of devilish pride, as stuck out her flattened pink tongue to reveal a puddle of fresh ejaculate. It also ran down her chin and sides of her mouth. "I was bad..."

"Holy shit!! I can't believe it. That's so fucking hot! You have no idea. You did it! I LOVE how dirty you are! You're the sexiest mom ever!"

"So I take it that I'm even hotter now than before? Lol"

"YES! What did you do with him?"

Smugly shrugging, Heather messaged, "In short: I rubbed his dick through his shorts. He started rubbing my pussy through mine. Next thing you know my blouse and bra are on the floor and I'm sucking his dick."

Paul stood up. He wondered if he had just touched her there if he could have had that too. "That's so hot. You took your bra off for him?! That would be so hot. I'd kill to see you topless like that! Did he want to cum all over your tits?"

In her son's Snap, Heather could see how mesmerized her shirtless son was. Even in a photo, she could tell that his athletic chest was heaving. "Yeah, I took my bra off for him. He asked to cum on them." Heather then sent another Snap. It was a video slowly panning down to her bare breasts, with her arm wrapped over her areolas. "But you can see he didn't. I wanted proof to show you. So we both agreed there was an easier place for it ;)"

The 18-year-old wanted to pass out. He was lightheaded and aroused like never before. "I want to touch them and cum all over them so fucking bad! Would you take your bra off for me if I asked?"

Heather was swimming in and craving his words. "You should have asked to see them... I was clearly in a giving mood ;) If I had known you were so pent up that my dirty thong couldn't handle your load, then maybe I would've let you unload all over them ;)"

"Seriously?!" Paul's abs were clenched in his photo. "You'd let me do that? I'd wanna make a hot mess all over them."

In a video that showed her fondling her breasts, Heather replied, "For you? Of course. I'd even wipe you off on them after to make sure I got all of it ;) I'd want it to be as hot and sticky as fucking possible."

"Oh fuck. I love you! I'd do anything to make you happier. Could I cum in your mouth?"

Paul's statement of love warmed Heather's heart, but it was not enough. "I only use my mouth for giving head. I think that's a line we're not going to cross. And I love you, too. Whenever I'm jerking you the fuck off and you look in my eyes, remember that NOBODY will ever have it better."

That last message was too much. Paul needed his mom right now. But she was in a stranger's bathroom in some random room. As a first, Paul sent his mom a photo of him masturbating. He showed his girthy seven inches and showed her how it was harder than it had ever been. "I NEED you right now so much it hurts! Please, please help me!"

When Heather opened the new message, her almond eyes were open and she staggered in the small bathroom. She had to catch her breath. She did not know why, but up until then, it had never hit home that she had been sexting her son. It just seemed like a fun game. And now, it was undeniably about sexual desire. Heather put on her clothes, said goodbye to the exhausted man, and hurried back to her room.

To Heather's horror, Rich was back in the room. But she had entered their bathroom so quickly that he did not have the chance to see how she was dressed. Her mind kept going back to how horny her son was and how bold it was of him to send her that photo. She knew he had to be worried that she had not responded.

She was right. Back in Paul's room, he was a nervous wreck. He kept calling himself an idiot for screwing everything up because of one dumb decision. He could see his mom had opened the Snap and that it had been over six minutes without a response. Paul sent two apology messages.

Finally, after a half-hour, Heather responded with a blank screen. "Did your roommate see you do that or is he sleeping?"

"He's sleeping I swear. And I was in the bathroom. I'm so sorry! He didn't see anything or know anything about it."

Seconds later, Paul got another message telling him to check his door. There was nobody standing through the peephole. He hesitantly opened it up and found a skimpy red lace thong resting in his threshold. He was nervous because he did not know what it meant. Given how his mom had reacted to his photo, he assumed it was her way of telling him that he had to go back to solving his erection problems himself.

Paul paced in his bathroom. "Why did you give me this?" Paul sent a picture of his fingers holding the lingerie.

Heather, in her bathroom, was getting into a bath, phone in hand. With a straight face- and just her face- the mother replied, "Good, you got it. I gave it to you because I saw that photo you sent me."

"Does this mean I have use your thongs for now on without your help?"

In a surprise video, Heather showed her upper body, above her areolas, in her bath. "Haha no. I gave you my dirty thong because I want you to be so pent up that it fucking hurts. Then tomorrow you can cum as much as you want all over these." At the end of the video, Heather raised her chest out of the water slightly, revealing the tops of her round, pink areolas.

"Oh fuck. You love teasing me too much! Are you naked right now? I am. You're not mad about the dick pic?"

While looking at the photo of her son's face, she let her hands slip into her demanding cunt. "I'm naked too. And the only thing that made me mad was that it was a pic and not a video. So how about you tease me?"

"You want a video?!" Paul's strong upper body was in the photo.

"Fuck yes. Wrap my dirty thong around your cock and stroke that big fucking cock of yours. Show me your body and your face while you do it. Make me want to be the one doing it."

Paul sent his first video. It was more than half a minute of him massaging his dick with his mom's thong. Heather could see the lust in his eyes. Her fingers massaged her clit in the tub.

"Send me another." Her eyes were wide.

Her son sent her another video.

Heather could see the shaft pulsating. "Do you still have that lube? Use it. I want to see every detail."

It took a few extra moments, but Paul sent back another video with his lubricated shaft. It highlighted all the taut expanses, veins, and ripples of skin. "You're the only one that can make it cum. Can you show me your tits again?"

"Fuck. Your cock is definitely to my liking. I bet you'd be leaking if I were there ;)" Instead of showing her areolas again, Heather sat up and revealed her entire wet, immaculate chest. It was smooth and creamy all the way around. Her nipples were medium length and hard. "How does it feel to know you're gonna feel these tomorrow?"

Paul's eyes were like saucers. "Oh my god. They look even bigger with no bra! I want them so bad! I want you more than anything."

In an insatiable heat, Heather lifted her breast up and licked it. "You keep sending me videos. And I'll keep sending you them. Okay?"

The son agreed profusely. The mother and son continued to send erotic videos back and forth. Each one seemed to be steamier than the last. Heather admitted that she was masturbating in the tub, and that just made Paul send even longer videos where he was stroking harder.

Heather soon got to the point where she was on the verge of climax. She sent a video of just her reddened face breathing. "You're gonna make me cum."

"I want you to squirt in your tub. I want to make you do it."

"You have no idea how bad I want to be stroking your sexy fucking cock again. I want to feel your hands on my tits."

"You saying sexy stuff like that makes me wanna put my cock in your mouth."

That line sent Heather dangerously close to the edge. "Oh yeah? If you make me cum right now I swear to fucking god I'm gonna suck your cock like you won't believe."

"Are you serious?! Promise me." Paul's phone screen was coated with lube.

"I promise. Make me cum right now Paul. I'm gonna give you the best blowjob I've ever given until you cum in my fucking mouth."

"How can I make you cum? I wanna make you cum."

"Show me your muscles and tell me how bad you want your cock in my mouth."

Paul frantically took a video of his muscular body in the mirror. He flexed his arms and cut abs as he pumped his throbbing cock. His body was tight and in need of more oxygen. "I wanna feel your fucking tits and see how far I can shove my cock into your throat. I wanna feel my balls slap your chin and my hands hold your hair."

In Heather's bathtub, upon viewing the new video, the commotion was so loud that an exhausted Rich momentarily lifted his head off of his pillow before going back to sleep. Inside the bathroom, Heather held her hand over her mouth to avoid her husband hearing her loud gasps and moans.

That orgasm ripped through her and took control of her legs and arms. Despite being in a warm tub, Heather could still feel her hotter liquid jet out against her inner thighs. It felt as if there was no energy left in her body. She just wanted to fall asleep in the tub.

But more than that, she wanted to see Paul's face and for him to touch her. She was still catching her breath when Paul sent another message asking if she was still there.

"You just made me have an amazing orgasm. I squirted a LOT," Heather smiled in her photo. "You got to return the favor ;) Thank you."

The feelings of pride in himself and happiness for his mom washed over Paul. "Great! I wish I could've seen it. It was so much fun! So are you going to help me with a blowjob tomorrow?"

With a deep gaze, Heather bit her finger. "Just tell me when you're behind the trailer ;) Make sure we have a LOT of time. Don't bring anything to clean up... I'll be handling that."

"This is crazy. It's gonna be so fucking hot! I want you so bad. I can't believe it's actually going to be you doing it to me! I'm so horny." Paul had sent another video of his hard cock and muscles.

"I know you're horny lol. I want that big cock of yours to be begging for relief." Heather sent a picture of her naked waist up and her biting her finger.

A blue-balled Paul replied, "Since you're wet again anyway, can you send me that bikini pic of your ass now? :) I really wanna see it again."

The mother sent her son a short video of her rolling her eyes and a patronizing shake of the head. "Hell no. I've shown you WAY more than enough tonight. My tits and cum in my mouth weren't enough? Lol"

Paul playfully shrugged, "You're right but I figured I'd ask to see if you'd do it for me anyway lol. I can wait until the next time we go swimming ;)"

Getting out of the pool, Heather wrapped herself in a warm towel. She knew how to drive her son crazy, and she was loving doing it. Paul soon received a new photo of his mom standing with her back to her mirror. The bottom half of her firm booty was visible below the towel line. "I'm going to say goodnight now so I can prepare for tomorrow."

"No! I'm still so horny! Can we talk for longer? Please!"

"You being this horny is the point haha. And before I go, how sexy do you want me to dress tomorrow? (And by 'sexy' I mean slutty lol)." Heather had a wicked grin from her impromptu idea.

"However you want!"

"I love how you want me to be myself. Trust me though... It will really fucking turn me on if you tell me. On a scale of 1-10."

"This is fun! What's a 1 and what's a 10?"

"1 is how I used to dress in front of you. 10 is my bikini."

"Haha... You wouldn't wear that there. Dad would see."

"I don't care about what he thinks and neither should you. He hurt your future so that he could get off. I would just tell people I'm there to swim. Give me a number ;)"

Paul did not know what his mom meant in regards to his dad. But, suddenly, things started to make sense. And, frankly, given how things had turned out, he was happy his parents' relationship was now the way it was. "7. I like the idea of you be scorching hot but still some things left to my imagination ;) Tease me like you like to lol."

"Noted ;) Goodnight, sweety. I love you. Get some sleep! You'll need it for your race... I can only help you so much ;)"

"I love you too mom! Goodnight. I can't wait for tomorrow :)"

------Part Five------

 Ch. 28

Sunday was the day of Paul's heat. He had to finish in the top two spots in his heat in order to qualify for the championship race in his boat class. And just making it to the final would likely draw great interest from Princeton.

The race schedule on Sunday was even more in Paul's favor. His race was not until noon. This was especially good considering that he was so horny that his heart rate did not subside enough for him to fall asleep until after midnight. When Paul awoke at 9, he reflected upon everything he had done with his mom the day before as if it had all been a lucid dream. Did that really happen like I think it did?

Two floors beneath Paul, Heather was having a similar experience. She had been awake for some time now and had been paralyzed in her bed, thinking about yesterday.

As the mother replayed in her mind everything she had done, she breathed so quickly that she was risking hyperventilating. That was until she saw a simple message on Viber from her uncertain son that read, "Good morning, Mom :) Are you still feeling the way you did last night about everything? I don't know if I'm remembering things the right way or how serious you were about things."

Suddenly, the same rush of excitement she had felt yesterday made its resurgence in Heather's brain. Adrenaline began flowing through her body, and she sat up excitedly on her bed. "Good morning :) And things are a bit of a blur after the pool haha but I think I remember everything. I'm just carefully selecting my outfit for the day ;) Breakfast at 9:30?"

The mother and son both chose clothing that they hoped the other would enjoy. Paul wore loose boxers, black athletic shorts, and a white sleeveless-tee, rather than donning his unisuit right away. Heather put her makeup on, and she was jittery when imagining her son's reaction to her appearance.

When it was time for breakfast, Paul took the elevator down to the hotel lobby. He walked into the restaurant and searched for his mom. She was not hard to find this morning, as most men's eyes would have found her easily.

Standing near a table she had chosen, Heather was smiling at her son, proud of herself for following through. Under her shining red hair and gorgeous face, Heather was wearing a heather-grey, pullover sports bra- one that she clearly brought to wear underneath a camisole at the hotel gym. It had a seamless scoop-cut with a band wrapping around underneath and was designed for moderate support and lift to her breasts. Below her exposed and slender midriff, Heather wore her form-fitting jeans. Strings from a black lace thong seemed to have been intentionally poking above her waistline. In addition to her purse, she wore worn, white tennis shoes that were practical for outdoor walking.

"Um- hi," Paul quietly stammered. He was enchanted with his mom's appearance this morning. She looked more beautiful and sexy than ever.

"Hi, there," she replied with a tone of deserved cockiness.

The restaurant was crowded, so Paul could not say what he wanted to say, especially with the number of men taking glances in his mom's direction. The mother and son got their buffet breakfast and sat down to eat.

Paul needed to say something because unlike his mom, he did not get off last night. So he took out his phone and sent his mom a message on Viber. She was seated right across the table, but he did not want to risk other people hearing him compliment his mom on how hot she looked. "You look more attractive than I've ever seen you! And this seems more like a 9 on the sexy/slutty scale than a 7 ;)"

Looking at her son after reading his message, Heather beamed. She bit her lower lip and messaged him back. "It might be an 8... I couldn't really help myself ;) You don't seem too disappointed though."

"I'm very happy lol. I didn't even know you had a top like this."

"That's because I'm supposed to wear it under something else. And I didn't know you had a top with cut-off sleeves like that ;) I guess you wanted to feel sexy on the date too."

Seeing his mom refer to it as a 'date' made Paul's heart race. He adjusted himself under the table. "So do you usually give head on the first date? ;)"

Across the table, Heather laughed and nearly coughed up her eggs. She snuck a sexy gaze to her son. "First date? I thought that last night when you invited me to the pool was our first date?"

Paul grinned, which made his mother perky. "Is it really a first date if another guy picks you up and you blow him? Lol"

Heather ran her fingers through her hair. She typed a long message. "The way I remember it is you flirted with me, seduced me into my bikini, had fun with me at a hotel pool, and then I sucked a guy's dick because I was horny and wanted to turn you on by showing you what I could do to you. And then you gave me the best orgasm I can remember. It was my favorite first date ;)"

Paul's feet were anxiously tapping under the table. "You let a guy cum in your mouth. But then again I guess if we got naked for each other then it kind of was a date ;) I can't wait to start our second one."

Speaking out loud to her son, Heather responded, "Well, let's eat fast so we can get going."

 Ch. 29

Even the Uber ride over to the river had an intoxicating atmosphere. The mother and son continued to share glances and send flirty texts. But once at the river, they had to go their separate ways.

"When do you want to meet me?" the son asked.

The mother had done the math earlier. "I have a feeling we will want to take our time. Maybe 11? That's half an hour of fun, and it gives you time to get changed and get in the water."

"Uhh... I don't know if I can last half an hour with you," Paul laughed nervously.

Heather hugged her son and then reached into his shorts. She inserted her blue thong from the previous day and lightly felt his semi. "I can make you last as long as I want to. I'm not gonna let you get away until I'm fully done with you." Heather was now holding a full erection. She did her son a favor by tucking it under his waistband.

"I think I'm in love with you," Paul dryly blurted out, his head spinning.

As the mother broke off the hug, her cheeks were bright red. "Falling in love on the second date?" she teased. "You better stop talking to me the way you do, or you might make me do it too." The blushing mother winked and walked away.

Paul had to somehow get his mind back on his strategy for the race for the time being. He knew that once he walked over to the trailer, his mind would not be on the race again until he heard the starting pistol.

 Ch. 30

Her confidence, which Heather felt when with her son, seemed to stay with her even after they had walked away from each other. When approaching the team canopy, it felt wrong to be dressed the way she was. There were some reservations, but there was a joy from the freedom of no longer feeling the need to exhaust herself to please the parents. Though she knew she was a bit overboard today, she liked the idea of making it clear how she was no longer going to change herself for them. Them- the people who had known her for years but never cared enough about her to get to truly know and befriend her, and instead always tried to use her for their personal gain or entertainment.

At this point, they can think whatever the fuck they want. Heather reveled in her new attitude. And the reaction she got at the team canopy was even more impactful than the one she had gotten in the restaurant earlier. From the moment that each parent caught a glimpse of Heather, the rumor, which none of them had actually entirely believed, suddenly became indisputably true.

There was a pep in Heather's step, a swagger in the enticing curves of her body, a bounce to her chest and legs, and poise in her eyes. When she mingled her way into the team area, nobody knew what to say. They thought they were watching the devolution of a traditional woman. But, in reality, they were watching the growth of a woman entering a new and thrilling stage of her life.

The stunned crowd stopped gawking and turned back to each other to whisper. Gretchen soon came up with something to say. "Huh, this outfit of yours has me thinking..."

Determined that Gretchen would not get the better of her today, Heather bit. "Ha-ha. Well, don't strain yourself too hard."

Gretchen recoiled. She threw away the line she had for a more stinging one. "It has me thinking because- you know the old saying- 'Don't dress for the job you have. Dress for the job you want.'"

Heather was fed up with Gretchen. "Ha-ha. I was actually going for 'escort', but, like, really high-end and hard-to-get. Not some streetwalker that would bang a high-school coach to get her son a better position on a sports team." Heather did not expect to say that, but she was glad she did. It was possible people could have overheard her escort comment. But the mix of horror, rage, and desperation on Gretchen's face would have made it worth it even if every person in the rowing community had heard it.

That was the last time that Heather was harassed by Gretchen or Mary. And considering Mary's son was given a position beyond his talents, Heather was sure that Mary had a similar arrangement with Rich.

After finding an empty chair, Heather checked a new notification on her phone. It was from Quinn, the man she blew last night while thinking about her son. The mother read the message about him wanting to come over to the team canopy to talk about his organization, and then maybe spend some time alone with her again.

Heather told him to send someone else over to talk to the parents. And they already had their one moment of fun last night, and she had something much more important to focus on.

 Ch. 31

The minutes could not have gone by any slower. When it was 10:50, Heather sent a message to Paul to see if they were still on for 11.

"You can meet me there now :)" Clearly, the time had been going slowly for him as well.

Heather hustled away from the camp without saying a word. "Are you hard yet?" She Snapped, making sure she got her lively hair and chest in the video frame as she walked.

Paul responded with no words and just a video of the dirty blue thong wrapped around his skyward erection. Heather walked even faster.

When she arrived at the detached shipping trailer, sitting in the isolated back corner of the unfilled parking lot against the dense pine trees, Heather knocked on the side of the white paneling. "Hello?"

"I'm here, Mom!"

Heather disappeared from public view and into the small but private world that her son had found. Paul was making the most of the privacy by being naked, with the exception of the blue thong wrapped around his hard shaft.

"I'm happy to see you, too," she quipped. The mother and son hugged.

"I figured it would save time. You already saw me naked last night anyway."

"That's true," Heather commented, examining her son's carved abs and strong, lean muscle. "But, I think things are a little bit better in person."

Despite talking last night about how much they wanted to touch the other person, the mom and son soon found themselves standing there and not knowing where to begin.

"So, how do we do this?" Paul was anxiously excited.

"Good question." Heather laughed nervously. "It's a little different than when I felt I had to help you right away and could just start doing it."

"Well, I'm already out of my clothes..." Paul playfully hinted.

Heather smirked. "Hey, I already gave you permission to feel my tits today. Nobody is stopping you from taking my top off."

"Wait, seriously?! I thought you liked teasing me?"

The mother inspected her son's longing eyes and stiff cock. She lifted the bottom band of her sports bra and lifted it up and onto her areolas. She revealed sizable bottom cleavage. Rolling her eyes, she asked, "Are you teased enough now? Because I was hoping I could feel you take it off."

Paul wasted no time. He stepped to his mom and grabbed the bottom band of her gray sports bra. His hands brushed against the exposed skin on the sides of Heather's breasts. A spark shot through her spine. Paul pulled the top straight off of her head. Heather held her arms out so he could toss it on the ground.

The 18-year-old's attention was now squarely on his mom's bare chest. They were calling for him to reach out and hold them in his hands- not that he could fit them in his hands.

Heather looked up at her son's face. "I can tell you like seeing them in person ha-ha."

"I want to do much more to them than see them."

"Oh, I know. You made that abundantly clear last night. If you touch them right, I think you'd be able to do just about anything you want to them." Heather breathed deeply in anticipation.

Things were definitely much better in person. Paul eagerly reached out to touch them, only for his mom to swipe his hands away.

"And what do you think you're doing?" Heather's tone was stern.

Paul was startled. "I'm sorry. You said I could touch them?"

"Yes... After you let me finish getting undressed."

The son examined his mom to see that she only had sneakers and jeans remaining. "Wait, are you taking all of your clothes off?"

Heather laughed again. "Uh, no. But you've already seen me in my bikini. And if I'm going to wear this sexy black thong, I might as well get the appreciation for it I deserve." She pursed her lips in self-pride.

Paul swallowed. It was just a couple weeks ago that he was so desperate to just see the outlines of his mom's body that it was torturous. And now, he was watching her take her pants off so she could show him her skimpy, black-lace thong.

The mother took her sweet time pushing the tight denim down her thighs. When she was finally finished, a thin layer of sweat formed on Paul's forehead. She was tantalizingly close to being fully nude. "Wow..."

A large dollop of precum spewed from Paul's pink cockhead. It rolled down underneath his cockhead. Heather promptly reached out and wiped it off with the back of her hand. "I'm glad to see you like it so much."

Simply unable to take it any longer, Paul darted his arms out and placed his hands on his mother's breasts. She gasped and moaned. Paul squeezed them and kneaded them. It was a heavenly sensation for both Paul and Heather.

Heather and Paul both stared in awe over what both of them were permitting to happen. It was much different than when Heather had jerked Paul off under the guise of 'helping' him. They were doing this for no other defensible reason than that they wanted it.

"Oh fuck." Heather reached down again to grab her son's thick cock in her hand. She stroked him. "Fuck. Keep going, Sweety. Try lightly pinching the nipples."

Paul did as his mom asked. Heather moaned again, and Paul knew he was doing a good job. And he remembered his mom pledging he could do more if he touched them the right way. So Paul dropped his head and placed his mouth on her left areola and nipple.

"Holy shit! Did you just fucking put your mouth on my tits?" High gasps left Heather's parted lips.

"Yeah. Is it okay?"

Heather placed her hand on her son's chest before returning it to hold his testicles. "Yeah. God yes, just keep going. Don't stop unless I tell you."

Paul swirled his tongue around one nipple while flicking and rubbing his hand over the tip of the other. Clearly, whatever issues he had pleasuring his own body parts did not carry over.

Heather's toes were curled in her tennis shoes. She could have stood there all day and let her son send wave after wave of pleasure through her chest. "You're so fucking good at this," she cooed, massaging his penis. "Ha-ha. You didn't get my red hair. But did get being un-fucking-believably good with your mouth from me."

Paul was ecstatic. He wondered if he was really as good with his mouth as his mom said. And he imagined how good she had to be with hers. "I wanna jizz all over your tits. I wanna jizz all over you."

"Mmmm. Fuck. I don't care where you fucking cum as long as I can taste you."

"I need my cock in your mouth. I want you to blow me so bad."

"Oh yeah? Good. We won't be needing this anymore." Heather dropped the dirty blue thong to the side. Heather ran her hands up and down her son's hard body.

The son caught his breath. "I can't believe this. I never thought it would actually happen."

Heather smiled. "Me neither. But we fucking deserve this." She lowered herself to her knees. "I want you to hold my hair back."

Paul nodded. "You look so hot right now. I love you so much." His mom was essentially nude. He could see over her and see her round butt cheeks resting on her ankles. "That thong is my favorite so far."

"I love you too," she smiled, her knees in the grass. Heather then tugged on her lace thong straps. "And I'm pretty sure it's just your favorite one because it's the one I'm wearing."

The son could see the outline of his mom's vagina under the thin black fabric. "You're definitely right."

The mother then pumped his shaft and massaged his testicles, letting him drizzle onto her hands. "You are pent up just I wanted you to be ha-ha. And hey, if I just jerked you off, would you be able to get off?"

A moment of panic hit Paul. "Wait, what? I thought you said you were-"

"Paul, Paul..." Heather rolled her eyes. "I'm going to suck your dick. But, if I weren't, would you get off from just a handjob."

"Uh... I guess so. Yeah, I'd get off from that."

"Are you 100% sure?"

"I'd say yes. I'd definitely get off. Why?"

The mother grinned devilishly. "Good. Last time, I had to jerk you off so you'd get to your boat. I don't want either of us to think there's a reason I'm doing this other than we fucking want it." Heather saw her son's eyes light up. She moved her head right next to his warm, enticing cock. "Tell me I don't need to do this. Tell me I can just jerk you off."

Paul stated honestly, "You can just give me a handjob. You don't need to blow me."

With that, Heather's green eyes gazed into her son's. She stuck her tongue out and sensually licked the entire length of his package- from balls to tip. Paul twitched and moaned. Heather's heart was racing, and she tasted some of his juices. "You taste good."

Paul held her auburn-red hair with one hand and her right breast with the other. "I'm gonna cum soon. There's no way I'm lasting, mom," he panted. "You're too hot."

The sexiest eyes Paul had ever seen were staring directly up at him, with the incredible amount of love and belief that only a mother could give her son. "Sweety, I'm going to do things to your cock that I've never done to anybody else. You're gonna get head from me that nobody else could ever get because I could never love anybody in the way I love you. And, Paul, I know that you love me enough to last to the end."

His mother had made him speechless. Paul stared into her eyes as she lovingly took another lick. "I just want to be inside you."

Heather did not hesitate to give her son what he wanted. She licked once more before angling his dick and inserting it into her mouth. She could not fit all of it in, but she was certainly close enough to feel the heat of his testicles on her chin.

The son grunted and ejaculated more precum. Heather pulled her head away. She looked up at her son and slowly parted her lips, showing him a string of his juices stretching between them. "I think we should make this as hot and messy as possible. Don't you?"

Paul increased the pressure of his hand on his mom's boob. He tugged her hair lightly. "You look fucking gorgeous down on your knees!"

Heather grinned and began blowing her son. She rhythmically bobbed her head in and out, using her tongue to swirl around his sensitive cockhead. Her saliva made Paul's shaft shine. Her own saliva mixed with Paul's sticky juice and ran down her chin. "Mmm," she moaned around his penis.

There were too many things for Paul to look at and appreciate. But his eyes kept coming back to her cameltoe in the black lingerie, which was becoming more and more defined as Heather rocked on her knees. "I love that black thong. I wanna see you squirt in it."

She had already been wet, but now Heather was flooding and steaming between her thighs. She blew harder, and she felt her son's balls clap against her lower chin.

Paul could see how much it was turning her on. Through his heavy breathing, he added, "I wish I had been there last night to make you finish in person."

"Fuck," Heather gasped for air. "Who taught you to talk like that? I'd say me, but I think you're even better." She shook her head, "Keep talking to me like that."

There was never a better time for Paul to tell his mom how he felt. "I've wanted you to since my fucking birthday. You were so fucking perfect that night. You were everything I wanted. You still are."

Heather released a high-pitched moan around her son's cock. She knelt up and kissed up and down his muscular abdomen. "Fuck. I should have blown you right then. The moment you came in and saw me and your cock got hard. I should have made it mine."

That was the greatest thing his mom could have said to him. Paul promised, "It's all yours now."

"Oh, I know it is." Heather licked it again. "I should have told you to shut that fucking door and rode that fucking dildo for you while I sucked you dry."

Paul leaned down and held his mom's head up. He pressed his lips against hers. Her eyes went wide before she romantically reciprocated. The kiss broke the tension between them.

The son used his strong body to pull his mom to her feet. Moments later, their bodies were pressed together. And Heather and Paul were making love with their mouths. Their chests and hips were rubbing into each other.

The son knew what he wanted to do. He knew what would set his mom off. Paul pressed his thumb into the front of his mom's wet thong, pushing the black fabric into her warm, soaking mound. "I wish you had replaced that dildo on that chair with me."

"Ahhh! Oh fuck, fuck, fuck!! Paul, Paul, Paul. Oh god... Are we fucking do this?"

"I love you so fucking much. I want it right now."

Heather took her son's head in her hands. "Fuck, Paul, I'm fucking in love with you, too. I want you inside of me." She let go and quickly slid her wet underwear down and off her legs. She kissed her son again. "Fuck me right now."

To Heather's surprise, Paul lifted her up in the air and pushed her against the side of the trailer. "Fuck, this is hot." Heather could not remember being fucked while being held in the air before, or even pressed against a wall.

With his mom's back against the trailer and her legs wrapped around his hips, Paul held her up. He angled his cock toward his mom's pussy. He hadn't seen it since his birthday. "You shaved."

"I was gonna send you a pic of it later if you won your race," Heather chuckled. "But this is a better reason for it." She looked at him with those green eyes again. "Now, stop being a tease and fuck me."

Paul had few partners before, so he was concerned about his ability to satisfy his mom. Fortunately, Heather enjoyed the idea of teaching him. "Just put it in, and follow my lead. You're gonna be great."

Paul thrust his hips up as he let his mom's moist back slide down the metal trailer panel.

"Uh, uhhh, uhhh, oh! Holy shit! We're fucking doing this," Heather cried.


"Aaaggghhh!" Paul was lightheaded and was on another planet.

Once Paul was firmly inside his mom, and she was resting on his hips, they made out again.

"This is incredible, Mom. Holy shit. How do I feel inside you?"

Heather's feet were clenched and her hands her dug into her son's back. "Fucking perfect."

Still feeling a little insecure, especially because he was having sex with a married woman, Paul asked, "And, uh, like, does it feel as good as dad's?"

The mother rolled her eyes. Paul was mature for his age, but he was still a guy. "It's not a competition."

"Is that your nice way of saying no?"

"No... It's not a competition because you've already won, you dufus," Heather smiled. "I'm in love with you. Nobody else. You're fucking me right now. So, it doesn't matter anyway."

It was a dream. "I'm only in love you, too." The mother and son kissed passionately again.

Heather added, "But, since you asked," she glanced at her chest, "let's just say you get your genes for large, sexy assets from my side of the family."

Paul grinned from ear to ear.

Heather kissed her son again and pressed her lips to his ear. "So how about you shut up and fuck me with that massive cock of yours. I want you to cum in me before your race."

The lovers began repeatedly slapping their thighs together. Paul continuously thrust up-and-in and down-and-out. Heather continually adjusted her body and told him how to control his pace. And Paul had the physical gifts that were primed for this sexual position, as well as the ability to stimulate Heather's mind in indescribable ways. So, Paul's inexperience was more than made-up for.

The mom and son took turns kissing each other's necks and saying filthy or romantic things.

The hot, sticky mess that Heather had longed for was unfolding before her. Her gushing cunt was leaking aromatic juices all over her son's crotch and thighs. It mixed in with their sweat and his alkaline cum. The intoxicating smell filled her nose.

"I'm gonna fucking cum. I can't last much longer," Paul howled. He was close, but he never wanted their experience to end and to let his mom go from his arms.

The thought of her son's cock pulsating and orgasming inside of her sent Heather closer to the edge. And she was already dangerously close from how hard Paul had been fucking her as well as the things he had been growling into her ear.

"Oh fuck. Not much longer Paul. I'm almost there! You can do it, Baby."

They increased the thrust rate while they looked into each other's starry eyes. Heather could feel her climax coming. If she stayed on the thick cock much longer, she was going to finish and force her son too as well. She wanted to feel him ejaculate deep inside of her, but at this moment, she craved being a hot mess even more.

"Let me down right now!"

Paul promptly did as his mom asked. Heather immediately grabbed his balls with one hand and got back on her knees. She used her other hand to rub her clit, barely avoiding her breaking point.

Heather mouthed, "I fucking love you," and began powerfully blowing and sucking her son again. Paul's loins were rumbling. His legs were stiffening. The mother knew she only had a few more blows.

The swollen, throbbing cock in Heather's mouth froze up. Heather quickly pulled away. She grabbed the twitching shaft to aim it. Heather looked up at her son to see his face.

Paul squinted his eyes and grunted loudly. He was able to keep his eyelids open just enough to see the thickest rope of cum fire into his mom's open mouth. The second rope splattered against her chin and neck. The fourth, fifth, sixth, and seventh long strings of hot jizz shot down onto her smooth breasts.

His abs were clenched and eyes watery, but Paul remained standing. With Heather's grip on his balls, though, he probably could not have fallen if he tried.

The entire time, Heather continued to squeeze and pump Paul while rubbing her clit. White spurts and large drops still flew from the end of her son's cockhead. She made sure she was close enough where they hand to land on her. Finally, when Paul was just oozing slowly, Heather knelt up and wiped the remaining bit on her pounding chest.

Paul was too numb to speak. He could only look down and admire how lucky he was and how perfect his mom was. She stared back up at him, and then suddenly yelled, "Ahhhh- ahhh- ahhhhh! Fuckkkkkkkk!"

Heather's mouth was open even wider and her body went stiff. Nectar squirted from her vagina and sprayed her thighs. Her body trembled and her head was thrown back. She gasped and whined repeatedly. Paul felt humbled to get to watch it happen.

When Paul regained his sense of reality, he panted, "You look so beautiful. I love you so much. Thank you for everything."

Heather seemed to recover faster than him. She was winded but smiling. The mother tried to speak, but her tongue was coated in her son's semen. She tried to say, "You're welcome," but it came out as, "Orr el-com."

The mother and son laughed loudly together. Heather finally swallowed the rope that she chose to catch in her mouth. "Fuck, that's better," she grinned.

Paul squatted down and kissed his mom again. She was sunken down on her knees and butt. And she had no interest in getting up yet.

"You're definitely covered," Paul happily remarked.

"Yeah, I can tell ha-ha. I know you should be thanking me for that, but- I can't remember the last time I squirt like that. So, thank you!"

"I'm kind of a mess too," Paul noticed.

Heather leaned forward and began to lick every inch of his upper thighs and crotch. Paul was going flaccid, but it simply felt pleasant. "I told you you wouldn't need a shirt to clean up," Heather reminded.

"You might need one ha-ha."

Heather held her breast and licked some of his melting cum off. "That would be a little wasteful."

Paul and Heather kissed passionately again. Paul sheepishly asked, "Can I clean you up?"

"Uh, hell yes!" Heather fell onto her back and spread her legs in the air. She enjoyed the feeling of vulnerability.

Paul excitedly got on his knees. He started just below the sides of her knees. He smelled his mom's delicious nectar. It smelled just like the thongs she had been giving him. He proceeded to drag his tongue all the way down his mom's inner thigh.

"Oh, fuck, fuck, no! Stop!"

Paul pulled his head away in froze.

"Listen, Babe, you can do that to me literally whenever you want. But there's no way you're gonna get me off in time for your race." And like clockwork, Paul's alarm went off. He had to change and get into the water.

"I think I'd rather stay here," he joked, with some sincerity.

"Uh, no! We have the rest of the day to fuck around. You need to go race."

"Are you sure?" Paul joked.

"Hey, the only reason we did this was so that you could race well, and we- " Neither Paul nor Heather got through that sentence before cracking up laughing.

"I wanna watch you clean up, though! And we're gonna do this again today?!"

Heather kissed her son with her tongue. "I will take a video of me cleaning it up. So the faster you race, the faster you get to see it. And... the faster you race, the faster you can convince me to get into that sauna with you, or the pool, or wherever the fuck you can convince me to go. Now, go!"

"I love you, Mom."

"I love you too, Paul. I'll be watching."

After Paul donned his clothes and left to change in the bathroom, Heather remained among the wreckage. Her clothes were strewn about everywhere, and her son's 'affection' was running down her naked body. She let herself sit there, savoring the moment. She knew she did not need to be back at the camp for a bit.

 Ch. 32

Heather was still running a hairbrush through her moist hair as she arrived back at the team canopy. Maybe it was because she was no longer wearing her soaked black thong, which she had used to wipe her thighs down, but Heather felt as if everyone could tell she just had sex. The top of her inviting chest was still red, and her breath rate was higher than normal. Perhaps most damning was that she simply had that fazed, peaceful smile on her lips and in her eyes.

Not that she cared anyway. Heather's head was still swimming in dopamine, and she just wanted to watch her son race. There was a worry that he had physically exerted himself too much holding her up against the wall. She fucking loved it, but in hindsight, she should have ridden him.

Heather's concerns were valid but ended up being overstated. As Paul rowed down the river, he was in a comfortable second. It was not his best race, but it was looking good enough. Through her binoculars, Heather could see how agonizingly tough it was for him to generate power.

With a strong finish, Paul came in second and secured his position in the final. Heather was elated. She watched her son row along the other side of the river back up to the dock. His body language showed how depleted he was physically.

After the heat, Heather found it strange how long it was taking Paul to get back from the canopy. He usually got a speech from a coach, but the race had been over now for more than 45 minutes. Heather thought of walking down to the boat trailer, but she did not want to risk seeing her husband.

Finally, the mother saw her son's gate striding towards her. "There you are! Congratulations!" Heather hugged Paul. Some onlooking fathers wondered if Paul realized how lucky he was that his mom was pressed against him. (He did.)

"Thanks! I have good news!"

"What?"

"After the race, this assistant coach from Princeton said he saw me rowing. He said that I've been on their 'radar' for a while, but wanted to see more. He said, 'Have a good row in the final, and we might be making you an offer tomorrow.'!"

"Ahhh!" Heather screamed excitedly and hugged her son again.

Paul shoveled muffins, bananas, and simple sugars into his mouth until he could not eat anymore. Today, it seemed, in more ways than one, both Paul and Heather's hard work and perseverance over the years was paying off.

 Ch. 33

The Uber ride back to the hotel was tense. Heather and Paul wanted to put their hands all over each other, but they could not gamble on someone they knew driving by them. Once in the hotel elevator, though, things changed. The mother and son passionately made out and wrapped their arms tightly around the other.

When the elevator stopped on Heather's floor, she held the door and asked, coyly, "So where are you taking me on our next date today?"

"Umm," Paul blushed. "I'll have to think about it. I need to nap for a bit and reset ha-ha. But I'll come up with something you'll love."

"I'm sure you will," Heather grinned. "And it's our third date. So... if things go well for you, you might get lucky." They both laughed. "And, did you ever check your Snapchat?"

"Oh, shoot! No!"

"Watch it in your room. Make sure your roommate isn't there. And turn the volume up."

When Paul stormed into his room, he made sure he was alone. He then proceeded to watch two minutes' worth of videos of his mom wiping his jizz off of her body and eating it. The entire time, she was saying filthy things about how hot she felt and what she wanted to do to him when they got back to the hotel.

The son immediately wracked his brain for date ideas and wrote them down before taking a short nap.

 Ch. 34

"Do you know when dad is coming back?" Paul texted his mom, done with his nap and shower.

"Yes. Not until late again, why? ;)"

"I want to have the first part of our date in your room."

"Lol. Are we going to have sex BEFORE the date?"

Paul did not respond until five minutes later. "No lol. I can't take you to the restaurant downstairs and idk when Jack will be back. So I just ordered us food to your room. We can pretend it's a restaurant haha."

"Wow, taking me out to eat... Someone is going all out ;) What type of restaurant is this? I don't know what to wear."

"A little classy. Not too much though. It's romantic, not sexy. It's the place a lot of couples go and they can talk."

In her room, Heather found the message sweet. She had assumed he was going to do something sex-oriented. "It sounds like you found the perfect place for us then :) What time are you going to pick me up?"

"I'll be there in 30 minutes :)"

Half an hour later, Paul knocked on his mom's door. She was impressed to see him in the navy polo and khakis he brought in case the family went out to dinner one night. He was impressed to see her in the black blouse, skirt, and heels she had brought. He had to forget what she had done the last time she wore that black blouse.

The mother and son kissed hello. Paul was giddy to see that his mom had moved two chairs to the table in the room. And it was dark with the exception of the bed lamps. Paul turned on the music playlist he had found on his phone.

When the room service got there, the mother and son sat down and enjoyed a long meal. They spent the entire time talking and making each other laugh. They had never spoken to each other as adults before outside of sexual-related topics. It was wonderful.

When the food was gone, Heather thanked her son for buying her the high-end lunch. "So, Paul, what's your plan with me?"

"Like, what do I have planned next on the date?" Paul asked.

"No. Like, when you imagine us, what do you want us to be? How do you see us right now?"

The 18-year-old did not plan for this question. "Uhh, I can't say exactly. I just want to keep being with you like this. I want to be some form of couple. Right now, I guess I don't know where we are. I mean, I said was in love with you. And you said the same about me. I know that doesn't make us 'together'. You're obviously married, so I don't know if- How do you see this?"

Heather distilled the same belief in her green eyes that she had earlier in the day when she told Paul he could last to the end. "I told you, don't worry about my marriage. I've made my decision. And, honestly, until that's fully over, I don't know what I will end up wanting our relationship to be. I know that we can never go back to being anything less than this without destroying our relationship. And I want you in my life more than anyone else. But I want you to know that right now, I think of us as being together. You make me happy. I love being around you. I love you. And the sex is just- wow, ha-ha. So, why not try to figure out what we can be?"

Paul leaned over the table and kissed his mom. Soon they were making out. And Heather started grabbing at her son's shirt.

"Are we about to have sex again?" Paul breathed.

"No," Heather kissed. "I'm going to teach you how to eat my pussy out. And then you're gonna carry me into the shower and fuck my brains out."

 Ch. 35

The remainder of the afternoon and evening was pleasurably exhausting. Heather taught Paul how to eat out her wet pussy. At one point, she wrapped her legs around his head and threw her arms down behind her head. Paul learned the hard- and satisfying- way that it meant she was about to squirt on his face and mouth.

Heather rewarded her son for his accomplishment by letting him rest against the back wall in the shower while she took her time blowing him until he returned the favor of cumming in her mouth.

They were winded, but their trip to the pool and sauna right afterward reinstated their libidos.

After they stripped out of their swimwear in the hotel room, they finally got to have drippingly-hot intercourse again. And after Heather's body finally stopped convulsing, she took a moment to savor the feeling of being bent over a hotel mattress with her strong son tugging her hair from behind and thrusting his cock into her. When Heather felt Paul's sperm shooting deep into her vaginal canal, she knew what she wanted in life.

The mom and son were inseparable for hours. But when it got later in the night, Rich texted Heather to say he was finally coming back for dinner. Heather and Paul decided they would not see each other again after dinner so that Paul could be well-rested for tomorrow.

After kissing each other and saying how much they wished they could sleep in bed together that night, they returned to their acting roles as a platonic mother and son. They went down to the lobby to join Rich for dinner.

 Ch. 36

It was the day of the big race. Paul had never woken up feeling better. He had slept for more than eight hours. His muscles felt limber, and he had the bubbly energy of someone experiencing love for the first time.

The entire evening before, since his mom told him she could not message him after dinner, Paul was thinking of all the things his mom had done for him and sacrificed for him to achieve his dream. He felt undeserving, but he knew she wanted those things for him because she loved him. His scholarship to Princeton was on the verge of being secured, and he was determined to win for his mom.

When they met for breakfast, Heather was more flirtatious than she had ever been with Paul in public. They could not help gazing at each other from across the table. Paul was keeping this thought to himself, but he worried that someone would realize they were having an incestual relationship. What the son did not realize was that his mom was not wearing her wings. So it looked much more like another taboo- a seductive older woman with a hunky young man.

After riding to the river with their hands resting on each other's thighs, the mom and son parted ways. Instead of going to the canopy, Heather walked up and down the river bank on the beautiful day. She felt a sense of freedom and was awaiting the moment she would meet her son behind the trailer again.

When that time came, Heather and Paul behaved as if they had not seen each other in months. Paul tasted Heather's swirling tongue with his. She massaged his tongue and pulled him in with her arms over his shoulders.

"Paul, wait, wait. I need to tell you something." The seriousness of Heather's tone altered the dynamic of the moment.

"What is it?" Paul was still.

"This probably won't be big news to you. I mean, it'll probably make you happy. But, last night your father and I had a long talk. I told him I knew about Gretchen. He freaked out, but he calmed down when I told him I wasn't mad." Heather sighed. "He asked if I cheated too. I told him yes, without getting into detail. He admitted even though he was crazy about me, he never liked the idea of being married. I kind of always knew that, to be honest. And I told him I had fallen out of love with him. So, in short, we both decided we made mistakes and we would both be happier if we moved on." Heather added, "I think it's pretty amicable and we both agreed to be nice about it and stay 'friends'."

Paul was not surprised by the decision to divorce. He was a little surprised by the smooth outcome. Then again, he was getting the cliff notes, and it was probably much more intense at points than his mom led on. Still, it was weird to hear out loud.

Heather watched her son process the information. "So... What do you think? I think this gives all three of us a chance to be happier."

Silent for some time, Paul finally responded. "Well, I think he's fucking insane for not wanting to be with you."

Heather laughed with pride. "Thank you." She kissed her son.

"So, does this mean that I get to sleep in bed with you every night now?" Paul knew he was being optimistic.

"Ha-ha. Uh... I think I remember saying I would need some time to fully know what I want out of our relationship."

"Well, I know I want to fuck you right now." Paul removed dropped his shorts, becoming fully nude.
byJayPierce95©
"I don't think I could ever get tired of seeing that." Heather took her shirt off and slipped out of her shorts. "How does it feel knowing this is gonna be the first time you fuck me where I'm all yours?"

Their bodies came together and Paul tugged and ripped at his mom's underwear, desperate to get her into her most vulnerable state. Paul then went down on his mom. His mouth lovingly inhaled her scent and tasted her juices.

Heather gasped and moaned. "You're so fucking hot. I fucking love you, Paul! Take it all..." She urged. Heather did not know why she was so concerned about defining her relationship with Paul. When he fucked her in her room yesterday, she knew she wanted to be with him. She knew what she wanted in life. Her son could have asked for anything he wanted and she would have given it to him.

"I want you so fucking bad, Mom. I can't believe you're mine, now."

Heather pulled him up, pressed her lips against his, and then went down to her knees. She batted her eyes up at him. And in the same way that she had driven him crazy the day before, Heather slowly ran her tongue up her son's cock. "Mmm."

In that moment, seeing how Paul was looking into her eyes, Heather made a decision that she knew was the right one. "What if I moved a little closer to Princeton so you could visit more?" Heather asked before taking her son in her mouth and running her hands along his firm body. She then pulled her mouth off with a popping noise and waited for a response.

"Ahh, god that feels so good!" Paul grabbed her hair. "Are you really going to do that?! Close enough for me to visit every weekend?"

Heather kissed and sucked him again. She shrugged. "Close enough where you could spend two, maybe five nights a week at my place and go to class in the morning."

"Holy fuck," Paul's mind tried to process spending five nights a week with his mom all alone. "Like, sleeping in the same bed together like an actual couple?"

The mother smiled, loving how much her son loved her. "You'd have your own room. But if you fuck me to sleep every night, and you're already in my bed, it's not like I'd be able to kick you out." Heather winked. She went back to fervidly blowing Paul.

Paul was euphoric. "Oh fuck! Mom, I wanna take you on dates too and make you mine in every way. I wanna be messaging you all the fucking time. I wanna be with you in every way."

"Oh yeah? I think that can be arranged."

"So... Will I call you my mom or my girlfriend?" Paul quipped.

Heather shot up to her feet. She pressed her hand to her son's chest. "I am always your mom. And whenever your cock's hard, I'm also your girlfriend." Heather winked and pushed her son back on his butt. She never wanted to make love to anyone as bad she wanted to fuck her son in that moment. "For example, I'm about to fuck your brains out because I'm your girlfriend. But as a mother, I'm going to make sure I ride you so my son doesn't get tired before his big race."

"Holy shit," Paul breathed. "You're so fucking sexy. I wanna have you all the time. I want you to be both all the time."

The experienced mother angled her son's cock and sat on it. She knew she was giving Paul the same view he had when he saw her sit down in her dildo.

"Ooooooohhhh!" Heather cried with pleasure. Her son grunted loudly. Heather was in the same ecstasy. "Paul, you already fucking have me. If you want me to be both all the time then treat me like both all the time. If you wanna French me in a crowded restaurant, I want you to fucking do it. If you wanna shower with me, then walk into my fucking shower and pin me against the glass. I want you just as fucking bad as you want me."

Paul could feel his mom's tight, warm cunt around his veiny cock. He bucked his hips into the air, needing to be farther inside his mom. "Uuuuuuh! I wanna cum in your pussy so fucking bad."

Feeling and hearing her son's thighs slap against her ass, Heather threw her head back. "Yessss! Oh, Paul. I want to bounce on your dick like that fucking dildo."

The intense burning and the unrelenting pressure of their sexual organs made their heads fog in a lustful mist. It seemed as if no orgasm could ever satisfy them.

Finally, Paul yelled that he was about to blow. Heather leaned forward, pressing Paul's shoulder blades into the ground. Her chest and forehead landed on his body. Heather pounded back and forth as fast as she could. When she felt her son's body was on the edge, Heather clenched her nails into the tops of her son's shoulders. She closed her eyes and felt his firm chest heave again and again as waves of his hot cum flowed into her body.

When Paul had drained every last drop into Heather, she feebly sat up. It was going to take a bit for Paul to catch his breath.

When he seemed to have his head on straight, Heather, who was now lying on her back, spread her legs in the air. "Time for you to finish me off."

Paul could see his own cum spilling out of his mom's pussy. He was unsure. "I mean, I want to. I just- uh-"

Heather knew her son would be unsure about something so new and kinky. "Babe, first of all, I will be doing all the swallowing. You're just eating it out. Secondly, you're now with someone that likes things to be a sticky mess. Your dad never would do this for me. And some advice- If you can start doing this for me, things for you will get even better..."

"Oh yeah? How?"

Heather thought. "When I get everything I want, I want to give you everything you want. For example, when I go on a beach getaway with my boyfriend next month, it's the difference between us walking down the beach holding hands while I'm in that turquoise bikini, or me walking down the beach with him in a new bikini with a skimpy, yellow g-string bottom."

Paul was already sold, but he knew when his mom was in this mood that he should always ask for more. "Ok. I'll start doing this for you whenever you want. But how about we also make it official when I start at Princeton, like, with us living together? Not me visiting your apartment. Like, we call it our apartment and our bed."

Heather had never been wanted to badly. "Fine... Just promise when you're moving furniture into our new apartment that you do it shirtless."

Paul lovingly kissed his mom and then began to learn another new skill.



Paul ended up coming in third in Nationals after facing the best competition in the country. His medal currently hangs in Heather and Paul's new apartment outside Princeton, New Jersey.